And none of this would have happened if I didn't live in the frozen tundra because my son would've been walking home. And, of course, none of this would've happened at all if I hadn't just been bragging about the fact that I'd never been in an accident. Damn that Murphy and his stupid law!
After this is done I glued the shoulders, slightly turned in a way they don’t look so stiff, and glue the torso to the legs. You already have your basic model. Everything else will be detachable and usually kept in a ziploc bag for safe-keeping. You can even start painting it in case you take a while with the final step.
My hand stops.
Up at 6
1. I absolutely adore my bright bedroom with windows looking out onto the balcony. It's nice to wake up with light streaming in, in a warm, cozy bed. Especially now that Winter is settling in. The pendant lights that hang over my beside tables are also a favourite of mine... something different from table lamps!
So this year, he had to choose on either a big party, or a big gift. He had a hard time deciding, and finally chose the big gift. So, he will be getting either a handheld video game system, or maybe a mini laptop if I can find one for a good price.
So, I am on a journey of Celtic discovery. I have always felt drawn to the legends of the British Isles. My auburn hair seems a stark message that I have an interesting ancestry. My maternal grandmother is Irish, and I strongly believe and feel that she is the line from which I am descended spiritually. It is difficult to trace my family history due to various circumstances, but I will do it one day.
“Yeh, my favorite. How did you know?”
COPS Season 23, Episode 2, “Customs and Border Patrol
that are everyday living
This and that ...
So we went back to mine and she huffed my speed, smoked my weed and like she said, she gimmie her number – and at some point she picked this un and put it on the turntable...
close of a long day
Will weep when they have died.
2. Be passionate about, and
I really like the bangs on this style. Unfortunately, the rest of it is a little blah. Mom-ish, if you will. (And not in a MILF sort of way!) I think it could look cute either curly or straight.
In ancient times salt was used as a preserving agent as well as for flavoring food.
disappear in the cart under
Under two bucks at the Great Exchange
Getting America Right Feulner and Wilson
B and I have been house hunting for the past five months. But what it really feels like is life hunting. I know that we are looking at buildings. At walls. At empty rooms and spaces. But, when we walk through the threshold of each house, I immediately imagine our lives there. I picture eating our breakfast in the kitchen nook. I see us bathing babies in the tub upstairs. I wonder who the neighbors are and how many trick-or-treaters we will get on Halloween. I mentally decorate each space and B and I discuss paint colors.
Caspian Tern 20
It is quiet in the apartment today.
When Germany invaded Poland, Stuka bombers devastated Warsaw—and the city's zoo along with it. With most of their animals dead, zookeepers Jan and Antonina Zabinski began smuggling Jews into empty cages. Another dozen "guests" hid inside the Zabinskis' villa, emerging after dark for dinner, socializing, and, during rare moments of calm, piano concerts. Jan, active in the polish resistance, kept ammunition buried in the elephant enclosure and stashed explosives in the animal hospital. Meanwhile, Antonina kept her unusual household afloat, caring for both its human and its animal inhabitants—otters, a badger, hyena pups, lynxes.
Then Drew Carmichael transfers into Lizzie's high school at the beginning of the year, and she feels a connection to him, almost like she knows him. She can't stop thinking about him, but whenever she tries talking with him about the mysteries behind her feelings, he makes it clear that he wants nothing to do with her. Reaching him is even more difficult because she has a boyfriend, Jeremy, who has started to become full of himself after being elected co-captain of the varsity soccer team, and her flirtatious best friend Chelsea starts dating Drew soon after his arrival. So why can't she get him out of her mind?
Blowback is the espionage term for the violent, unintended consequences of a covert operation that are suffered by the civil population of the aggressor government. Originally, blowback was CIA internal coinage denoting the unintended, harmful consequences—to friendly populations and military forces—when a given weapon is carelessly used. Examples include right-wing counter-revolutionaries who sell drugs to their sponsor’s civil populace (see CIA and Contras cocaine trafficking in the US); and banana republic juntas (see Salvadoran Civil War) who kill American reporters or nuns (see Dorothy Kazel). See also: Osama bin Laden and the “War on Terror”.
Here we demonstrate how strong and flexible the silk fibers are, as we stretch a single cocoon across a queen sized bed.
Lo and behold, this Bitch Magnet tape from 22 December 1990 at the Jugendhaus in Ravensburg, Germany blew my mind. It is *awesome*. Clear, powerful, nearly flawless. I'm not sure if it's a well-positioned audience recording, or a soundboard with a prominent room mic in the mix. There are very few (read: I can't recall any, off hand) audience recordings that I've heard, of any band, that can be easily misconstrued as a mixing desk tape - but this could be it.
Polite fictions get us through the day.
The Qataris have been active in theLondonmarket in recent years and now control Harrods, the former Chelsea Barracks (just across the river from Battersea) and One Hyde Park (just across the road from Harrods) where 20,000 sq ft apartments were on offer at GBP £100m. Of course the fact that oil has hovered over the USD $100 per barrel price since the start of this year will no doubt have swelled the coffers of Middle Eastern sovereign wealth funds and European property investment might be seen as an attractive proposition at present.
I would like to hear from other people who might know anything of the details of this letter and it's historical context. If anyone has researched individual prisoners, I'd be interested in learning how you went about it. I don't want this man to be forgotten.
Zoe didn’t look for a mirror, which I found odd. Personally, I would look for something so I can see myself. Imagine growing up in a world where you barely (if at all) know what you look like. That would be one of the first things I’d do.
Take full advantage of the gorgeous weather with a pop of color, like I did yesterday
Dr. Strangely Strange- Frosty Mornings
Horse power or HP can be calculated using the formula
“RK Motors Charlotte is proud to sponsor the Fun Ford Series and do our part in contributing to great events,” says Jamie Wiehe, Marketing Director of RK Motors Charlotte. “From our technicians to our sales team, we’re all serious enthusiasts with automotive interests that extend well beyond selling collector cars. Events like Fun Ford Weekend, Super Chevy Shows and Mega Mopar help keep our business and our hobby thriving.”
Henry David Thoreau
ADDITIONAL STUDIES IN CHRONOLOGICAL ORDER (may be some repetition)
The personal benefit is that the dogma enables progressives to avoid facing reality. Progressives see people coming together in places of disorder and rebellion, and a mural of Israeli tanks in Gaza they see as street art, not a British Muslim threat of war against Jews. They take a superficial view of reality. It is a defence because if they looked deeper they would be frightened and have to face the future. In fact, they like to drive to immigrant areas to sample the way of life with an exotic dance performance or curry. That is like tourism and they are spectators of exotic life until they drive back home! It is a shallow view of what is going on around us
The egg a symbol of life
Reality changes in the blink of an eye. Like a turning gel flash and everything is suddenly red, then suddenly green, then suddenly white again. The things themselves don't change, but their appearance does. This makes everything so complicated. He says there is the Great Reality, the ultimate truth, that we can't really comprehend or interpret because of the limitations of our humanity. But that the closer we come to this, the closer we come to sanity. I will pray, then, to the Great Reality.
You can go through life with your eyes closed and your head down or you can look up and open up and savor the sweetest connections waiting around every corner.
My friends, we will speak today about your joyous emergence into your true selves. Your mental picture is most likely of a celebrating you at the completion of a process. That is a wonderful picture to have. But that is a picture of a reality that, although it exists now, is not yet your reality in your dimension.
I, her lover. Both her responsibility and her hobby. Her documentarian, her keeper in her hall of records and her best friend. I hold her stone fingers in my own flesh, provide her warmth with the fluid in my veins. My lens the only to sculpt her form. My tongue, the only to whisper in her celestial ear, to shape the stars of her colossal orgasm, and her faith in my kind. I miss New York.
What I do first is save the steps to a directory on my computer. I also have subdirectories for my own patterns and creations, and for images that inspire me, and for potential future pattern references. I then use Google's Picasa to view the images (though I've recently realized that it doesn't pick up on the png files that I've saved, or the gifs. Those, I've had to print through windows)
I cannot believe that the Justice Secretary, someone entrusted with the people's human rights can even consider such a thing in his most twisted dreams (of which I'd take a fair bet he has a few), let alone table a bill on the subject. The thing which gets to me the most is that the phrase "public interest" is being used. As in cases can be heard in secret if public hearing would be detrimental to the public interest. That's how I understand it.
Me: Well, a little child rearing, a little home painting, a little (or a lot) laundry, a little photography, and a little sewing (believe it or not!). Actually, I'm so glad you asked ... serging is one of the things I have been doing a lot of lately. It is a sort of mindless labor -- feed the fabric through the machine, push the foot pedal, and cross my fingers that the thread doesn't break. (my industrial serger can be a little touchy sometimes and when the thread breaks -- it is a REAL pain to rethread. I wonder -- are all sergers such a pain to rethread?) Sometimes I also wonder what I did before I had a serger.....and then I remember --Oh yeah, stringy threads all over the place!
See, I don’t think of the undead as some inherently evil plague to be visited upon mankind. The dead are just dead–they don’t hate the living or wish to destroy life or anything. Dead things have no opinions; they are precisely as good or as bad as their master makes them be. Just imagine if you could marshal a large force of undead minions and put them to work for the public good! Think of it: legions of brightly clad, well-perfumed skeletal creatures on every street corner, insuring public safety and guarding the public trust. Ahhhh…utopia.
curiouslee: I agree
The first misconception by anyone who’s accustomed to making corsets from other periods is that Regency stays should be shaped and fitted like a corset. Of course they should fit you, and of course they should rest along your curves, but a Regency corset has really nothing at all to do at all with shaping a woman’s body. It’s one of the only style of corset in the long line of historical undergarments that is not at all designed to change the shape of a woman’s body. A woman’s ‘natural form’ was the aim (except with a little levitation). It is designed to hug the natural shape of her chest and torso. The Regency corset should wrap tightly around the torso, it should be stiffened with some boning or cording to keep it from crinkling up on you, and have good shoulder straps.
If I close my eyes its hard to tell. The warmth of summer holds on, dawdles into the end of April, seems to be making overtures to May. Like kids in the park just before tea, holding on as long as possible, trying to make the day last before baths and bed. Like teachers on summer holidays, trying to hold on to the calm of last week as the term begins, and calm is just a memory.
I saw in your eyes
I used TH Idea-ology "Shabby Chic" PP to do this LO. Flowers used was MH and Flying Unicorn little roses that I put some Lindy's "Winter Jasmine Gold" on to make them yellow. I also used my Distress Stain "Walnut" in the center of the blue MH Flowers called "Sparkles-blue" and also some Gesso on the outsides of them to tone the color down a little and also match my project. The Branch I used is a Prima branch. The title is a CTMH Stamp and Butterflies are PinkPaislee "Butterfly Garden" and CTMH "Large on in center and small one at bottom right". The Swirls are also CTMH. Gonna put some close ups of this LO for you so you can see all the techniques better.
Remove the dough from the fridge and slice into 1/4-inch thick rounds. Evenly distribute approximately an inch a part on the baking sheet, then place two rosemary tufts radiating out from the center of each cookie.
Unless the group feels differently, I suggest you carry on tonight without me, and I'll listen to the audio afterward. Thoughts?
Until next time...enjoy the day!!!
Man oh man I need to learn to take the photos straight lol
Thanks for looking and till the next time and Oh ........ don't forget to leave me a comment.
YANP:I saw that at least one of the pieces he’ll be performing is by music now buddy, Richard Reed Perry. Is that one new?
I actually had three unpublished books. There was one unpublished adult crime novel, a Lincoln Perry novel, which to me is the first one. And then when I was at high school I wrote two young adult novels, and I count those, even if nobody else does (chuckling), because they showed me how to write books from beginning to end, and that’s a really huge part of the writing process; to just develop the discipline to stick with a story over how many weeks or months. So I’d written three novels, and I was working as a journalist. I’d covered everything from police beat to sports reporting, and about everything in between.
Post Secondary…Or Not.
Soul Asylum - One Way Conversation (A&M 1990)
Summary: God creates Adam, but sees that he’s lonely. He lets him name the animals, but he still doesn’t find a “helper” by doing this. So God makes him sleep (presumably in a coma) and takes one of his ribs, with which he makes the first woman, Eve.
If you do decide to read it, I recommend starting at the bottom, doing only a little at a time and balancing it with positive, uplifting spiritual material of your own choosing:
Learn from one another, one to one.
I would like costume drama more if it made the past a stranger, less comfortable place,if it shocked me sometimes by saying what could not now be said, believing what is no longer universally believed. Mind you it would probably never get commissioned...
“Anybody can be clever.”
Volunteers will be available to help all participants with the activities throughout the day. If the participant requires someone other than volunteers to stay with them, please let us know at registration.
Runner Up: Stockbridge Taps festival in Sept. Awesome selection
Pinsky said that the Yankees “don’t want to alert the potential bidders what they have in their budget for these items.”
Paul Theroux said all news out of Africa is bad. Indeed, the well-known narrative of Africa tells of a place that is regressing & riddled with corruption, disease & blight. But Ngozi Okonjo Iweala has identified reasons to hope.
When I was 29 my husband and I bought a house. A few days before signing the loan papers I was in full panic mode. Thoughts of living in a houseboat or moving from youth hostel to youth hostel flashed through my head. Anything but being tied to a specific piece of land FOREVER.
I whip out my comfort umbrella and attempt to shield myself from the acid rain.
Maruti Suzuki Quick is amongst the most successful hatchbacks about Indian paths. Having a fresh approach to layout and development, Maruti Suzuki has made the best-in-class automobile for the Indian auto market.
In a bowl combine the cake mix and soda and beat until no large lumps are remaining. Add the cherries and liquid and stir until combined. Pour into paper cupcake liners about 3/4 full. Bake at 350 for 15 minutes.
Thus, Cymbeline can be forgiven, to an extent, for not being as effective as Lear because the latter is a genuine tragedy. But I think Cymbeline is actually not even as effective as a romance as Pericles, even though Pericles is a far more problematic play textually than Cymbeline. Pericles has just a ton of corrupt passages and parts of it were probably not written by Shakespeare, or, if they were, they were written on a day he was feeling particularly uninspired. Yet despite Pericles' not-quite-finished feel, its resolution is far more affecting than Cymbeline's, particularly the scene in which Pericles is reunited with his long-lost daughter, Marina — a scene that brought a tear to my eye.
Each minute the last minute.
With my cousin/inaanak/online games tutor (yes, he’s the one who teaches me how to play online games and he’s only 7, fyi!) Cedrick to keep me company. He thought me how to play ddtank that day. Hahaha.
You know there's no excuse
"It's so hard to believe," Colin said as we crossed the steaming, empty parking lot toward the bowling alley.
You can easily follow Poly Pliés but clicking the button at the bottom of the right hand column. Now go ahead and let the tweets take center stage!
The biggest problem I have is when other adults ask what I'm reading or look at me funny when they see I'm reading a "children's book". I usually mumble something and quickly change the subject, as though there's something wrong with what I'm reading, when in fact, these are some of the best books I've ever read. This year, I'm going to work on being less self-conscious and start verbalizing more about why I'm reading the book and why I'm enjoying it.
These are some other projects I made with the kit!
So, one night this week, when my big 'ol body couldn't get comfy, and my hubs loud snoring wouldn't allow me to fall back asleep, I got up and stained the shoe kick.
number += 5;
Welcome to another month here at CCAYR! We're so very happy that so many of you played along with us last month and you can keep your eyes open for a challenge winner in the next week!
12. Mary Had a Little Lamb
Okay, I'm going to cut this short (just too many interruptions). The next four books--New News Out of Africa: Uncovering Africa's Renaissance by Charlayne Hunter-Gault, They Would Never Hurt a Fly: War Criminals on Trial in the Hague by Slavenka Drakulic, Mukiwa: A Whilte Boy in Africa by Peter Godwin, and The Lemon Tree: An Arab, A Jew, and the Heart of the Middle East by Sandy Tolan--well they all just sounded good. No points.
Indeed it is a torment, since human beings are designed, socialised and have evolved to be interdependent creatures, we are to trust and be trusted to ensure survival and proliferation of the species.
Base level salary or compensation packages are brought into stark relief when considering the introduction of lateral hires whether at shareholder/equity level or as a non-equity partner. Firms will want to draw an appropriate balance between offering a seductive package (which therefore will often contain a high fixed element) and the creation of flexible compensation which is tied to the performance and success of the laterally hired partner. The overall package needs to be sufficiently attractive to persuade the partner to leave his or her current firm but the hiring should never be carried out without reference to those who – perhaps as a remuneration or compensation committee – have the responsibility for the firms partner remuneration and compensation setting for the whole of the firm. It is worth noting that the level of fixed or base salary set for the new laterally hired partner will ultimately affect the base salary structure for the rest of the partners – too high an introductory package can destabilise the firm and lead to key existing partners leaving the firm.
Back at the dorm, Tosh is chatting online, trying to find a sex partner. The killer replies with an instant message, and they start flirting online. As Tosh leaves the room to get ready for her "date", the killer tells her in the IM that he's already in her room. When she sees the response, he throws her onto the bed, and begins to suffocate Tosh to death. Natalie enters the room, hears the muffled cries, and assumes that Tosh is just having sex, so she leaves the light off. After Tosh is killed, the murderer passes by Natalie's bed, and leaves a message in blood that mimics the urban legend she learned about from the book: AREN'T YOU GLAD YOU DIDN'T TURN ON THE LIGHT? She calls 911, and is questioned by both the dean and Reese. Nearby, Brenda and Paul watch as the dean asks Natalie about the incident. Both the dean and Reese try to convince her that Tosh committed suicide, but Nat doesn't buy it.
Back at the Barclays Center construction site, work continues at a brisk pace. After buttoning down and concentrating on interior construction over the Winter, with Spring came appreciable progress on the exterior that changes the facade of Barclays Center on a now daily basis.
What can readers expect from Ditched?
4) Susan Lemons, in her resourceful book Hompreschool and Beyond, has a whole chapter about curriculum and MASTERY and SPIRAL programs. I will not reveal all her ideas, it won't be ethical, but she goes to the heart of the matter when she says that the three R's are mastery subjects, (Reading, Writing, Arithmetic), and they should be taught to mastery and using mastery programs. She then defends the teaching of phonics (in line with Charlotte Mason), but also like her, preferably not earlier than six years of age. As for reading she sees it though as much more than reading and has extensive and helpful lists of books, programs, games, activities, etc, on how to teach specially young children. Her preference for math is Rod and Staff for math. Science, History, and Geography are what she calls exposure subjects, and as Jimmie, she says that a spiral program can be good for these. I believe the classic education method as presented by Susan Wise Bauer advocates the spiral introduction of History in cycles, children then will be learning about Egypt three times in their life, at different depth and levels.
The creators of this are so sure that it sucks, they have disabled comments on the video over at YouTube.
There is a possibility that the Eurozone might start to fragment. It might indeed do exactly that, with a strong effect on our own economy as Europe is one of our biggest trading partners. Having no real central economy or economic policy is proving to be the weakness of the Zone.
“…I found a picture of you in a book…and you wrote on the back of it…remember?”
has is waking up there, because his heart just misses HOME so much ~ and man, I
The First Campaigner Challenge is on Monday, so pop back here then if you want to take part in the fun!
*soft mat
With some of the world's best sushi as its focus, the film is unquestionably first and foremost a feast for the senses, with stunning almost voyeuristic shots of glistening fish gracefully pressed over rice, nori swept over open grill, all to a soaring score by Phillip Glass.
Jeans, KappAhl; tank top (under my shirt, not visible), Joe Fresh; shirt, ???; shoes, Merrell; head band, Lululemon; coat (on the ground behind me), Mountain Equipment Coop
So I told the lady I was working with that I would quit if she would and we had to turn over our smokes to the strong-willed non-smoker among us. She will also be our cheerleader. Right now…I could fucking use one!
Thinking about those days in the past made me realize something. I sat down and took off the new pair of expensive running shoes I was thinking about buying. I placed them back on the shelves where they belonged. I put on my old shoes and took off with my friend to the other aisle. I grabbed a pair of the regular, reasonably priced ones. Ordinarily, I would've purchased two pairs. But I only needed one for now. My friend raised her eyebrow, and she asked me why I changed my mind. I told her, the other shoes just didn't fit right. I paid for my new shoes and still had enough money left over to buy two new pairs of the expensive shoes. But we went home to drop off the shopping and headed out to eat.
Thomas G. Crotty, 42, Rockville Centre, N.Y.
Set in the religious town of Varanasi, it is essentially a love triangle. The story of Gopal, Raghav and Aarti, young kids from small town India and their dreams, aspirations and the underlying corrupt system. The story is narrated from Gopal’s perspective which is sometimes slanted, sometimes very piercing. A failure in life, he longs for the girl who is his best friend and yet the one he cannot have for she considers him a ‘good friend’ but no more than that. He comes from a poor family and suffers through the drudgery of life equating money with power and success. Aarti is a driving force in all that he does and so as the story progresses, he continues to try to win her affections with his efforts to impress her with the money and power that he gains.
Now we can go IN the house when we're not supposed to and walk OUT of the house when we're not supposed to!
The Nieman article puts a positive spin on this, dubbing it "microdistribution," pointing out the benefits for the store's financial bottom line and for raising the store's profile in the community. (Though I do wonder about paying for recommendations--does the store vet the books it recommends, and if not, what kind of fallout might there be if a really bad book is featured?)
leadership, that’s an assault”
10am Saturday morn and tills were unusually quiet in Galati’s. Instead the masses were milling around chatting over lively music. Watermelon juice dripping down fingers and crispy fresh arancini balls crunching whilst munched. Galati & Sons hospitality makes their annual cutting of the giant auricchio provolone quite the event. This stinky sharp cheese has been fattening up for months now, towering as it hangs in house from ceiling to solid ground.
1 tablespoon finely grated lime peel
I stamped the sentiment again in Memento Rich Cocoa and the ribbon in Memento Angel Pink and of course, some sewing around the borders.
In my last year at primary school I was a bit of a rebel. I just didn't treat art seriously, preferring to draw cartoons rather than the serious painting my classmates were doing. I was developing a political mind, my dad's bible was The Ragged Trousered Philanthropist and his beliefs were rubbing off on me. He hated the Tories, so did I. Ted Heath was an idiot and I entitled one cartoon '3 Eyed Ted From Number 10'. Ted Heath with his big toothy laugh and three eyes, one in the middle of his forehead. I didn't know what political point I was making, maybe that the Tories were aliens and should head off back to their own planet. I have a suspicion that Steve Bell somehow saw my cartoon and somehow made a career out of portraying Tories as monsters. Tories are not of this world, though. There's something inhuman about them.
23:00 GMT: For what it’s worth, today has seen by far the most visits to this blog of any day since I started it in September: about 6,000 hits since midnight GMT, twice as many as the previous highest-traffic day (which was April 4, the day I wrote that Peace Corps was pulling its volunteers out). People seem to like it when I blog about bad news or the sound of gunfire. I can’t exactly promise to keep that stuff coming, however. In fact I can’t wait to get back to blogging about mundane bamakois life — higher education, gender relations, the Djakarta, the local martial arts scene…. For months I’ve been knocking around an idea for a post on the dojos of Bamako. But in light of Mali’s recent political trauma, the thought of writing about such things seems in poor taste. I’ll get to them someday, when all this is over and Bamako is again a rather dull place to be.
NBI – clearance (though releasing is still pending)
Seek help from your child’s teacher or the school guidance counsellor. Most bullying occurs on playgrounds, in lunchrooms, and bathrooms, on school buses or in unsupervised halls. Ask the school administrators to find out about programs other schools and communities have used to help combat bullying, such as peer mediation, conflict resolution, and anger management training, and increased adult supervision.
Pat: Yes. Any of the sites will allow you to pull the book, or to update it. It’s a remarkably flexible system for authors. I can also experiment with price, but I haven’t tried going the $0.99 route yet.
So I had a “wild hair” and redecorated our kitchen as a retro diner theme. It still is a work in progress, but we got rid of our old table and bought a retro metal table with retro chairs. It looks really cool, but there is a problem. With our old table, we could push all of the chairs in and keep the dogs from jumping up on them and getting on the table. We can’t do that with this new table. The chairs are out just enough for them to squeeze the larger than normal carcasses on to and then up on the table. Well at least one of them does, the other one is a little large and struggles. Thank goodness.
It has not yet explained whether or not this implies that Nelson Mandela, who famously donned Francois Pienaar's Springbok jersey at the World Cup in 1995, is a Nazi collaborator.
CLICK ON IMAGE TO ENLARGE
in that secret
WE CAN MAKE A DIFFERENCE….
There's a few brewpubs and beer bars in DC itself I've been dying to try, so we MAY slide over there some time on Wednesday. Then it's back home on Thursday morning. Holla.
And for this reason journalists love anniversaries. If you’ve watched TV or opened a newspaper in Austin lately you’ve noticed that everyone has been carrying on about the 40th anniversary of Charles Whitman’s infamous shooting spree on the UT campus, usually festooning their stories with lame, melodramatic titles like “Death from Above,” “Austin’s Darkest Hour,” “The Tower of Doom,” or “The Clock Struck Murder.” But this unbelievably hot weather has taken a toll even on me and my usually dependable creative juices–so against all my better judgment I will acquiesce to the roar of the mob and weigh in with my own take on the Whitman case.
I calmly suggest we get the fuck out of here!
So, I see different shades of grey: things are continua, not just two extremes. This also means that, while I generally am right about everything, I can compromise – because I realise that a person who opposes my views might also have some smart arguments. I’m guessing (and this is what my empirical evidence also suggests) that this may be more difficult if you only see two options (like right and wrong)
I was told by the friend who gave me the original tape that the guy who mixed this tape was one of the many members of Saxon. He (my friend) used to work in the evenings for Saxon doing the light rig for their stage show, I spoke to him yesterday and he still reckons that to be true!!!
She never seemed to do it. She doesn't wander off into imaginary play and get lost there for hours. Her dolls have collected dust, polly pocket and Little Pet Shop stuff got unwrapped, put in a drawer and that was it.
You can follow Margaret Atwood on Twitter HERE and if you do feel like joining in with this utterly bonkers but probably amazing journey through Margaret’s fiction writing career, then do let me know in the comments below.
15:33: While explaining ways to expose anti-smoking lies, McFadden recommends a newish book on the matter, The War on Smokers and the Rise of the Nanny State by Theodore King.
Pinterest takes the concept bookmarking websites and revitalizes it with the use of images and videos, now called “pinning.” These pins are much easier to use, lessen the clutter on users’ browsers, and allow for the sharing of websites through the use of easy to view pictures. These pins can be categorized by subject matter and can be shared with those who follow you, or with complete strangers browsing the site for the first time. This simplicity and user-friendly functionality makes Pinterest a perfect match for clients who wish to not only garner more views on their websites, but also want to become a better known name in their areas of expertise. Pinterest is currently available as an app in iTunes, as a mobile browsing site, and as a web-browsing application that can easily be added to a user’s toolbar. An Android app is in development.
JS - The only difference is, one of the great Rangers mottos over the years has been “dignity” . There are other clubs we know in Scottish football who are heavily indebted but they feel a sense of honour and dignity towards local tradesmen and towards local businesses and would not dream of doing other than paying their bills.
“That would be better. Even when I play beautiful classical music Tigerli doesn’t let it interrupt him!”
I like that the university has begun its own press -- University Press of Victoria. There is an amazing amount of creativity and progressive action toward publishing here, all of it good for the university and the town itself. More plans are in the works for books and literary journals. And today I heard discussion of possible writers' workshops.
Shoes – My tip would be have a look and see if anything you already have is suitable, if so let that guide your decision regarding what dress to buy. That way you don’t have to spend a cent. Try to find something with a mid sized heel or failing that make sure that you have some good sturdy straps to give your ankles plenty of support.
Whenever you see Kevin James in a film, your mind jumps not only to comedy; but a lot of physical, slapstick comedy. Which if you’ve ever read this blog you know I’m not a fan of. Paul Blart: Mall Cop, Zookeeper, Grown Ups, etc, means I was expecting the same thing.
In U.S. Philips Corp. v. ITC (Fed. Cir.; September 21, 2005), the appellate court disagreed with the line of analysis employed by the International Trade Commission in concluding that Philips’s package licensing agreements were patent misuse per se, or under the rule of reason:
I bought a branch of fall leaves and cut all the leaves off so I could use them individually to circle the cake board.
And I remember, all those crazy things you said
$20 per family, with no workshops
The program went on to explain, those who incur these unnecessary foreclosures may have a terrible credit rating for a while, but they get a much more affordable house. Yet, a relatively small percentage of people are defaulting for this reason. The reporter suggested that there is a social stigma of shame that overrides the financial considerations.
The only candidate that has stood up against this bill: RON PAUL.
Were you underneath the sofa? Did you keep on jumping into the wardrobe every time I walked in? Was there some big conspiracy not to let us miserable ho’s in on the secret of your existence?
I know for some today is a wonderful holiday that you look forward to & others loathe it. But instead of being miserable or sad that you don't have a significant other try to make the best out of it. Your time will come, I promise :) Plus think of all the money you are saving right now without having to stress about buying a gift!
"Because I'd rather go in the evening."
The Poetry Episode!
She is going to start her play-school after her birthday; I don’t know whether she is going to cry on the first day or will it be me. Looks like me. I want her to go school and learn as my little girl is growing up. I think times fly and only memories will be remain forever.
Too damn long to figure what matters the most
Bell Air Blues by Drywall
A Hellish Fire burned.
For the record, it was the opposite of pleasant. This is one part of parenting that “they” don’t tell you about before becoming a parent. The necessity of tick checks and the joy of doing them. How thorough you have to be in doing them. How you have to explain it to your child adequately and get across how important it is without giving them panic attacks.
No doubt, the win had to ease anxieties on both the Lakers team and along their fan base.
To my horror I hear Osborne is thinking of removing even more tax-free benefits from savers. He has learned nothing from Brown's mistake, nor does he understand the inevitable consequences of his action.
Remember also that the London protestors were turfed out only a few days ago. If ours is the last capital city left with a camp full of crusties in the middle of it, then in the eyes of our ultra-sensitive politicians we might be in danger of turning into that most terrible of things: “The laughing stock of Europe.”
What I mean by lifestyle transportation, rather than utility cycling, is that my choice of daily transportation mode means I choose a lifestyle that integrates my transportation choices. For me, it is primarily cycling combined at times with
One of the more difficult types of gardens to manage is a fruit garden.
all photos, unless specified, by SwF
The reason for HDR is to extend a camera’s limited dynamic range
Taking the suggestions provided by a nursing advisor, I will be working towards getting my Associates in Nursing. I had an appointment at the community college and discovered that I only have a few more classes to take prior to submitting my application for the program next year. Because I am choosing to take the journey rather slowly, I will have plenty of time to take most of these classes one at a time. My goal is to submit my application during the Fall, 2013 semester for the Spring, 2014 program. Until then, I will be taking as many of the science classes now so, when it comes time, that part will be done during the nursing classes themselves.
I'm high on my tribal sci-fi mode again! Some of you might remember the last time I did this- coincidentally (or not?) it was the same time last year but it's been off and on in my work since 2009. I was at the tail end of my Victorian tribal and getting bored with it -still loving the tribal, but waning on the Victorian. Looking for something to breathe new life in it, I bought up an old trick taught to me by an art professor- he said 'if something's not working, think of it's opposite.'
Macy’s
...and the list goes on...
The second trial, in addition to correcting the yeast amount, focused on changing how I used the sweet potato. For the first trial, I used it as part of the flour ratio, which probably made the dough wetter than it should have been. So I used it as the “liquid”, making it dry and having to balance that issue with additional liquid, going from too dry to too wet in seconds. Instead of putting in flour, however, I put in whole CGF rolled oats. I still wasn’t content with the bagels, but the oats did something to the flavor and the texture that reminded me of a hearty bagel.
I decided on Thai Basil (yummy anise flavored basil), Thai chilis, and Lemongrass. They all require full sun, which they will happily drink up out on our deck. All of these plants would grow well inside your home if you have a nice sunny spot, but I have the kidlets and the wieners, both of which are not conducive to growing plants indoors without spilled containers and/or plucked leaves and/or chewed up plants which results in a very angry Mommy...
The stories that detail his adventures are colourful and entertaining, but they aren't very scary. They lack tension. They lack tension because the main character, Silver John, quite rightly, is wholly devoted to the cause of good. He's God's man through and through. So evil can't touch him. All he has to do when confronted by an evil spirit is say a prayer and the evil spirit backs off. All attempts to bring him over to the Devil's side are doomed to failure, for John is no fool. He is immune to blandishments, threats and flattery. Even if a beautiful lady vampire sucks up to him, he'll always resist.
1082 D-IX/16/1990. “Ethnicity and Patriotism.” Greek-American Community Services of Chicago and the Illinois Endowment for the Humanities, Copernicus Center, Chicago, Illinois.
Piano Complete
A wonderful blend of apple cider, (you know, the cloudy kind from squeezed apples and not apple juice) fresh juices from just-picked local oranges and pineapples from afar brought into the area by local seamen along with spices from the far east. The whiskey of course was regional too. Make up a batch and watch your guests 'warm-up' to you quickly. Enjoy!
Buying bread from a man in Brussels
Three weeks later I was saved, the next week I received the spirit of the Holy Ghost and spoke in tongues for the first time, later that summer I received the gift of healing and performed a faith healing on my great-grandmother’s chronic headaches, which she swore lasted a whole week. I also participated in casting out my first demon that summer, it was a spirit of man-hating in a young woman in the congregation who had been abandoned by her father, and who later went on to marry one of my cousins. As the summer drew to a close, I became concerned about how I was going to continue ‘walking in the light’ when I returned home. My uncle’s Church didn’t have any affiliates in my area, but he assured me that if I prayed and searched, God would find me a home congregation.
They claim to hear and speak for God but fail to uncover sin in the flock.
A testimonial from a thank you note written by one of my students:
Oh no! I'm having a Shim dilema...
I am also torn about whether or not to begin at least some vaccines for Finn as he gets older and we enroll him in school, where he will be regularly exposed to other children. Do I assume/hope his immune system is better able to handle vaccines at age three than it was when he was an infant? It still feels like a huge leap of faith to me, faith that I’m not sure I have.
It didn’t used to be that way. It is today. EVERYONE does this trick! That means people have put in their information (name and email) before and gotten stung.
“It’s now nearly two years since David Cameron promised change for Britain.
being
Mother’s Day: 10 Apps She Will Adore – Hopefully your Mother’s Day gift is already wrapped and hidden under the bed, but if you’re scrambling for last-minute inspiration, it’s simple (and cheap) to gift one of these apps, assuming she has a smartphone or a tablet. (If she doesn’t, well, you’ve just found the perfect present.)
Mr Sheridan asked Mr Coulson if his newspaper “printed lies” to which he responded “We try not to.”
Oh yeah and we have to tweet everything we eat at the end of the day… Knowing that people will see what I consume helps a lot but I’m sick of being judged because I tweeted about eating carrots with peanut butter (don’t knock it till you try it).
N
Schenck’s position was that the government was breaking its own law. And not just any old law, but a part of the Constitution, the highest law in the land. If you ask me, he had a good point, but whether he had a good point is not the point. The First Amendment is supposed to protect our right to speak, even if we have nothing intelligent to say. A cursory perusal of pretty much any media anywhere in this country will illustrate that constitutionally protected inane chatter is alive, well, and evidently well supplied with amphetamines.
08. Jump
AMADEUS
after pondering what we could do with it for a bit, we decided we could turn it into a bookshelf for the millions of books my mom keeps buying baird haha! i haven't mentioned it before but my mom's thing is buying books for baird. of course i love it since im an english teacher but, nonetheless, we need a place to store all of them. because we arent in a super hurry to get this project done, we are doing it in phases. phase one, which we completed tonight, was deconstruction and clean-up. we removed all of the parts that we didn't want to include, making the back open and ready for some shelves that we are going to put in. we took off the doors, although we might put them back on, not sure yet. we took out all of the screws, all of the brass details, and the cute little deer. after doing all of this, we cleaned it all up with a rag and some wood cleaner. i also borrowed some brass cleaner from my mother-in-law to clean up all of the brass. stage two will consist of retrofitting the empty cabinet with some wood shelves and sanding the entire thing to prepare for paint. its nowhere near done but at least we finally started it.
The first reason is that their powerful guitar playing sounds Iron Maiden-esque for a mid 70s band and catches the attention at once. The second reason is that the voice of Karin is both very powerful and enchanting and sounds androgynous, which give the tracks a feel of fairy-tales. The highlight here is Loneliness, a beautiful powerful epic lasting 20 minutes. The tune is both heavy blues and melancholic passages in the vein of Pink Floyd. The doomy bonus track Y.T.T is reminiscent of Black Sabbath and really rocks !
After our filling brunch, we headed to Portland Nursery to buy a few vegetable starts! It was a perfect day to spend with a friend!
Indeed, I can’t even think of an obvious reason for why this is happening (although as always there are a number of possible factors; some serious, some really not).
Birthday hexipuffs.
_____‎"Life is test." and my grade is "F"
Due to shipping restrictions the winner must have a U.S. Shipping Address.
ZP: Oh no, no. Like I said the whole project of Privilege is making tangible things. It’s not so much the matter of the album as a tangible item as I mean as a unifying concept. I also like physical objects and so things like Record Store Day I’m glad people are still doing that, and there is support for the physical store. I don’t know, I guess the idea of putting out a forty-five minute thing, that is twelve to fifteen songs long just arbitrarily seems kind of like a dated idea. Music comes out in different ways now, and people relate to it in different ways now than that.
Cameron's administration is a highly ambitious one and needs highly effective ministers to successfully carry through its reform agenda before the administration's political capital runs out.
At the time, Boeing was still considering an all-new narrow-body, and McNerney suggested it could stretch that aircraft for the 757 replacement market or develop a shortened version of the 787.
Several claim that within a block radius in Southeast Urbana—where many members reside—they have collectively amassed the best beers that exist in the world today. I think it's a mile radius, but Brady said that the block makes it sound cooler.
WOW! I've only posted two of the 8x8 24th Street Station series paintings and one has already sold :) I'll be posting the other two on Etsy today, and I'm working on finishing the larger 18 x 18 piece as well.
if me belly doesn’t shake,
"We are appalled by her actions, just as we are with abuses of power against farmers of color and female farmers," the statement said.
Thirdly, we see the effect of censorship, secrecy and lack of scrutiny. The combination ensured that, even when the problems were known, very little timely action was taken other than, to ensure the guilty persons were not censured, an extensive, multi-layered cover-up was embarked upon, which survives to this day.
"We'd like two shots of tequila please."
I got home and went to my room feeling elated and went to sleep. When I awoke the next morning I remember feeling whole and good for the first time in my life, because I believed I had finally connected with God. I immediately sat up and stuck my fingers in my ears to hear more of the “divine music.” Sure enough after a few moments it began, faintly at first and then louder.
*Do not, I repeat, do not use spray oil (aka Pam) on a nonstick pan. This will ruin your teflon - it will become sticky and useless. I have forewarned you. Go forth and use a paper towel saturated with olive oil.
inside this breezy drift of ribbons,
First, stick a bunch of evergreen clippings into the dirt. No rhyme or reason really, I just stuck a bunch of them in. Next, stick something tall in the center. I used some curly willow branches I had in a vase inside. I haphazardly added some white lights at this point, stood back and decided it was a little too blah. So I took some clippers to our holly bushes which are very festively in bloom with lots of red berries at the moment. Magnolia leaves would have been nice too. But ours grow at a near glacial pace and I felt bad clipping anything from them. Finally, add some color with shatterproof ornaments. I rigged mine up on some stakes.
Elizabeth: No, but I would like to thank you so much for the opportunity of telling you about Barbarossa’s Princess.
Now, for the record I don’t really mind the left spewing their hate. I think it helps reveal who and what they are. What I DO mind – and what got me into blogging – is the massive hypocrisy in which these people constantly denounce us for hate when they are so full of it themselves. These are people who have practiced hatred and violence for decades, and when we respond to their jackboots in our faces, they denounce us as practicing hate. As if the victim who fights the attacker is every bit as guilty as the attacker for any violence.
God the Father,
One of the fastest goal by Daniel Sturridge, followed by Captain John Terry, just after 11 minutes and Fernando Torres dual scoring, before first half, wiped out the hope of QPR to escape from the relegation zone.
There's a very real chance I'll get slapped with the misogynist label but one thing we have in common, Ann, is that neither of us ever gave a fuck what people thought about us. Here's the difference:
Briggs's youthful readers have to be sturdy of psyche. Her tale of the Each Uisge, the Scottish water horse, ends with the livers of seven little girls washing up on the shore.
“I’m sorry that I did that,” Jawdat said during a phone call Monday from Israel. “I don’t want them to think I’m some kind of terrorist because the people who know me, they know I’m not. I’d like for them to give me another chance to come back and show them that I’m not.”
Science itself is turning attention to this problem and things are not looking good. According to one study (via Mooney): “The result was stunning and alarming. The standard view that knowing more science, or being better at mathematical reasoning, ought to make you more accepting of mainstream climate science simply crashed and burned.” It was found that conservatives who knew more tended to dig in their heels against new facts or budging their views, using what they already knew as bulwarks against changing their minds. But this did not hold for the other side. Educated liberals who were pre-disposed to be suspicious toward nuclear power nevertheless were adaptable when shown clear scientific data assuaging their fears. (I would love to see this experiment done on liberals re: nature-vs-nurture issues!)
When I went to put in the new string, something was blocking the hole. I couldn't poke it through with the new string end, so I dug out the seam ripper from my sewing machine cabinet (yes, I have one) and pushed the end through the hole out popped a little chunk of the old string. That's when I found out the new string's overwound part had been attached with a big blob of glue or melted nylon and wouldn't fit through the hole even though it had been cleared.
I had so much fun making my card this time, cause i really love to use more than one image on my cards, but hardly ever do so.
Again, let me make abundantly clear that I completely support augmentative and assistive technologies that will allow nonverbal children the opportunity to communicate. What I am against is individuals taking that technology and abusing it and the autistic individuals in their care through facilitating communication. Safeguards must be put in place so that it is abundantly clear that the communication is coming solely from the child. Neither FC nor rapid prompting allow that assurance.
I decided a little challenge would be fun! This month we are creating a Home Management Binder! Wanna Join in? Take photos and blog about your awesomeness as you go! I am hoping to do a giant, "We did it!" celebratory post where we can all link up our binder creating success stories at the end of the month!
Mix the mayonnaise with the garlic and chives.
What I love the most about these photographs is that they show the range and versatility of the artist. Nolan does these ultra-fine cinderblock paintings that are so realistic, your eye is literally tricked to see texture and detail....even though he paints on SILK! Then, he goes completely 180* in his photographs...which are huge macro abstractions.
Unlike most Conservatives, I’m not a Bible-thumping Christian. I’m pretty agnostic and non-commital on religion. I find that organized religion does more harm than good worldwide. You wanna know what I believe? Go Google up Flying Spaghetti Monster and that’ll do it. I’m a Pastafarian.
One day he says he loves, that he would be my all
Crafts for kids - summer fun, activities, etc
The laundry is only the tip of the iceberg. The lack of motivation is spilling over into other areas as well. My dusting in the house. The filing of papers. My coupon cutting. I am becoming so overwhelmed with the unfinished work that I don't know where to start. This behavior is so unlike me that it is really aggravating me.
That’s all I have for today, but in my small post is an overflowing sense of thankfulness because I may have gotten that spark needed to make another school year fun for me and my students. I know I will have the complacent ones. I know everyone will not be on board with the education train; however, with this new wind flowing through me, I will be sure to create A, B, C, and D plans to help them.
My husband has a slightly different set of fears than I do. He wants to wrap me in bubble wrap. I sat up on the kitchen counter this morning and he kind of freaked out. What if you fall?! he said. We are so on edge.
I think Alexa Chung would be cool because she is beautiful (like Tats & Tempest products), I think she's going to be around for long time (like Tats & Tempest products) and quite fun (like Tats & Tempest products).
When you’re not sure if the information you are about to take in will be retained by your brain, then its a good practice to write the information. Writing notes is especially effective in pulling together long, tedious information such as lectures or interview notes.
Hello~ and welcome to the part one of my rather small travel guide for Yangon, Burma.
In your whole life
NOTE: If I felt he was in full-blown withdrawals, like he was four years ago, I would check him into a hospital. He is not in that kind of condition.
So there you have the beginning of the average Topps sets. I would imagine that some of you would consider a couple of these sets (1968, 2001) to be rated too high and some (1955, 1985) to be rated too low. Feel free to make your case in the comments section. I always enjoy more information and feedback to make me take a second look at my opinions. I do not claim that my opinions should be considered doctrine. After all, I am simply an average blogger.
The United States government has been so compromised by these and other cabal families and their foundation fronts that the upcoming US Presidential “election,” is nothing more than a power struggle between the Chicago mob and their front man Mitt Romney versus the Bush Texas illegal drug mafia and their guy Jeb Bush.
That’s because the natural rate of price appreciation for houses is zero after inflation. Prices will eventually stop falling. They’ll resume rising. But over the long term, they’re unlikely to resume rising faster than inflation.
- Button-front shirts that are left open to the nipples (the better to show off the gold chains and lack of chest hair, presumably).*
Crack the egg into the food processor with the rest of the crumbs still in it. Grate 1 to 1-1/2 teaspoon of nutmeg. Toss that into the food processor, too. Pulse until well-incorporated. Pour in the milk and baking soda mixture. Continue to mix until a slightly lumpy tan batter is formed. Pour the batter over the crust in the springform pan. Bake in a preheated moderate oven for 30-40 minutes. It's ready when the top is golden brown, and when it passes the toothpick test (comes out clean). Cool the cake in the pan, and enjoy!
I sent this to Jerry….
Finally what has the European Union got to do with any of this?
The biggest problem, other than lack of variety and volume, was the strawberry shake. First of all, these aren’t shakes. The chocolate “shake” is much more like chocolate milk. The strawberry drink has a flavor that makes me think of drinking a cup of Amoxicillin or some other flavored liquid medicine! Unfortunately, not only do I have a strawberry drink a day all this week, but I ordered seven more for next week. Hopefully I can get through those, but I won’t be ordering any more. The vanilla (on a taste test) tasted like playdough to me, so guess I’ll be living on the chocolate. (And the chicken soup tasted toxic. Good thing I like the tomato soup.)
Total Calories: About 140
Here are some photos with various Muppets toys from the late 1970s and early 1980s. (Sorry, this was "B.E.": before Elmo) Those of you who are my age will probably remember some of these toys.
So off I went on my life’s journey with my programming loaded. I had success and failure along the way. This was measured by the financial outcome of the businesses I started or managed. Deep inside, I felt a rumbling that this was the wrong way to think about myself. Yet, it persisted for many years.
Recently I downloaded my Ravelry stash as an Excel spreadsheet and gave myself a heart-attack! Counting only the yarn I have currently recorded on Ravelry I have… wait for it… 51.5 kilometers of yarn. For those readers in the New World who still work in “Old Money” that’s six miles more than a Marathon of yarn!!! That doesn’t even include all my yarn! It excludes, for example,most of the 12 skeins of sock yarn I got in Janel Laidman’s Sock Club last year! The exclamation marks could go on and on!
DiS: You're playing a number of festivals this summer including Bestival on the Isle Of Wight and Electric Picnic in Ireland. What made you choose those particular festivals and will their be an extensive world tour later on in the year?
Venus Nolonger Between Us
Also, these white young persons had their lives to sacrifice to defend what was touted to them as “total strategy against total onslaught!” Some of them never made it back home from the borders and also those who went into exile to swell the ranks of anti-apartheid forces also suffered casualties.
And all these comes with some form of expectations, like:
And the problem is that people who are not spoonies find this impossible to comprehend – or simply don’t care. Hard to tell…
“Which regional border security marketplaces offer the most significant growth opportunities? What are the prospects for European and North American defence and security companies seeking business opportunities in the Middle East? How is spending on different types of border security technology likely to be affected as government budgets come under intense pressure? What is the status of the Secure Border Initiative Network (SBInet) or ‘virtual fence’ along the US-Mexico border? To what extent is public opinion driving government policy on border security? What effect is the economic downturn having on illegal immigration?”
lastly,the leftover of the keropok kacang DONE finish by me.hahax
Here are my goodies:
Once more, when praising the "glimmer of hope" shone by the "brief but bright struggles of the youth and students", the statement sets up another division between that "generation" and "the comfortable futures of even their older siblings". It seems absurd to me that any working class person in the UK could be described as having a "comfortable future" ahead of them. Everyone in a job - a shrinking percentage of the population - is being made to work far harder for less (or relatively less, inflation-adjusted) reward! Where is this "comfortable future" and just who is living it?
Practicing yoga is supposed to be about awareness. Reading these books has been like my first handstand: freeing and terrifying.What are you afraid of? How is it binding you?
Struggling with BPD is difficult. To lift my spirits and (hopefully) entertain others I created a thread titled:
I open my mouth to take one in.
Once the veggies have baked, turn off the oven and leave it while you prepare the pasta. Cook pasta according to the box in salted water. Once drained, toss the cheese with the hot pasta so that the cheese sticks to the pasta. Toss the baked veggies with the pasta. Serve by topping with meat and/or herbs. Enjoy with some wine!
And that’s where it all falls apart.
In Athens Paul encountered a city of idolatry, novelty, and philosophy. The Athenians were so open-minded that it was as if their brains had fallen out.
My window is closed and my curtains are drawn shut,
Most Malays have close friends or at least a relative if not more in the police and army, and this is where they deviate from the Chinese. In view of the pro- /anti-establishment bias aligned along racial affiliations, it was a wise decision by Indians to strategically sit out Bersih.
I made some progress on my pedal, I sort of learned how to read schematics. Hopefully I can get the rest of the circuit board put together later today. All I'm waiting on is the actual case to come in the mail.
in so much thought--
NUI Maynooth
April 18th, 25th, May 2nd, & 9th is for ALS TDI in honor of Pete Zucker:
Today's spooky Halloween offering isn't really spooky at all! This is one of four Halloween layouts I will have to make this year. Normally I complete a two page layout for each of my children, but this year there will be one more. It seems that no matter how old we get our family still loves Halloween (what was it I said yesterday about fun for kids of all ages - yes, I meant all of us).
2-3 lbs of chicken. Bone in. You can leave the skin on. You can also use lamb for this one.
The Tag is a slice off a Recipe Card and then the wipe bag remnant is stapled on for a pull-y bit.
Vyomesh Joshi: We believe 3D printing will be a very important opportunity long-term, and initially expect to see increased uptake in the commercial sector before it carries over to the consumer market. Similar to the growth of inkjet technology, innovative new industry segments are not built overnight. Given we are still in the early stages of 3D printing, customer awareness remains relatively low, and it is too early to speculate on overall growth targets. We expect that adding 3D CAD printers to our portfolio can help drive growth in the technical large-format printing market, which includes both 2D and 3D printing. Combined with our leadership in technical workstations, 3D printers also strengthen HP’s position in the overall technical design market.
“I don’t relate to happy poetry. This book is incredibly honest. What can you say that doesn’t sound ridiculously pretentious? She’s fucking Patti Smith.”
for their mindset works in one direction,
Solzhenitsyn says about Russia and other countries which have endured Communism: “Through intense suffering our country has now achieved a spiritual development of such intensity that the Western system, in its present state of spiritual exhaustion, does not look attractive… A fact which cannot be disputed is the weakening of human beings in the West, while in the East they are becoming firmer and stronger. Six decades for our people and three decades for the people of Eastern Europe – during that time we have been through a spiritual training far in advance of Western experience” (from the Harvard speech).
Everything That You Ever Wanted to Know About Bugaboo Stamps: A Short EssayAs if raising five children in the frozen land of the North was not enough of a challenge, Jodie Mackrell
Paddy Considine brings his calm, considered brand of Northern charisma to the role of Nash. It's a shame that both the actor and character are wasted here, since he's a likeable presence. Even without his immense Dead Man's Shoes beard, he owns the film. Overshadowed by a lost Mitchell brother, he becomes as underused as David Morrissey's journalist. I'd have much rather seen a film in which Considine and Morrissey team up to take Blitz down themselves; they couldn't do any worse than Brant, who patently shouldn't be allowed on any police force. Blitz does not do the London police any favours.
And, the key action of faith that releases this Divine Love is to forgive all those who have hurt or abused you in any way; emotionally, psychologically, verbally, or physically. This is the “Door” that is presented to us as being derived from the reception of our daily “holy communion” bread, in the prayer that Jesus taught His disciples ….
4) Work the Ribbon
The band started its recording activities in 1967 as KALEIDOSCOPE, but the band was formed back in 1963 with the name THE SIDEKICKS and changed to THE KEY later. In the beginning, the line-up was Eddie Pumer on guitar, Steve Clark on bass and Danny Bridgman on drums, but they later needed a new vocalist and Peter Daltrey joined (he played keyboards too). They played local venues and released singles, but when they signed a contract with Phillips, they changed the name of the band and started playing their own psychedelic rock compositions instead of the covers they used to play before. The combination of Pumer's musical arrangements and Daltrey's lyrics was the main power of the group.
But, I won’t overlook it. I consider it my mission each year to keep that festive feeling going for his birthday with cards from the kids, presents, a great meal and a cake! (I hope he’s not reading this, or the surprise is ruined.)
Our senses, however, and our natures themselves, have no immediate and single purpose the way a bat's sonar is immediately directed toward prey location. We don't hunt by instinct in the manner of a hawk or dog, but must consider the nature of possible prey and how best to capture it. We must understand the world in order to survive in it. Neither are we born with fur like a bear or build nests by instinct like a bird. We must figure out what will work for clothing and how to get it, and what will work for shelter and how to make it. This is why Aristotle says that the relevant distinction with respect to man is that he is rational, which means more than merely the degenerate "thinker" of modern thought, but an animal whose nature is to understand the world. And since we see that nature doesn't fail in its purposes (the bat's sonar does locate it's prey, the hawks eyes do see the mouse on the ground, etc.), why should we entertain the idea that our nature, uniquely among the creatures, fails to do what it is clearly meant to do - and that is to understand the world as it really is?
As delicious as this popular pie is, it is known for its "rich" reputation. It's sweetness can be somewhat overpowering. A lot of the time I struggle just to finish a small piece. So, I decided to make baby banoffees! A crisp buttery base with a gooey caramel filling, sliced banana and fresh whipped cream... all in one bite! Perfect!
6. The best and worst of blogging.
So early on Cusack/Poe is trying to wheedle booze out of a bartender, probably trying to convey "tortured writer self-destructing in a world where he is scorned and misunderstood", but instead he put across "giant douchebag". He starts breaking glasses and bottles and shoving chairs while screaming about what a misunderstood genius he is: "NONE OF YOU HAVE THE CAPACITY TO UNDERSTAND MY ART!" Crash, shatter. "HOW DARE YOU JUDGE WHEN YOU HAVE NO SOULS!" Clink, clunk. "YOU ARE ALL SCUM ON THE MUD PUDDLE OF LIFE!" (I'm paraphrasing.)
The young men falling in and arming,
So the workshop ended about 1/2 hour early (that NEVER happens), so I found myself with the rare gift of an hour to kill before I needed to pick up The Geej. I hit this weird shopping center near her school and ended up dropping about $70 in a Target lovingly known as the "Targhetto" because it's so skanky. But, it's still a Target. So there you go.
3. Don't store fudge or candy with crispy cookies or bars. Again, it will soften the cookies.
Such an ELF antenna can emit waves penetrating as deeply as several kilometers into the ground, depending on the geological makeup and subsurface water conditions in a targeted area. HAARP uses ground-penetrating radar (GPR) to beam pulses of polarized high-frequency radio waves into the ionosphere. These pulses can be finely tuned and adjusted so that the bounced ground penetrating beam can target a very specific area and for a specific length of time. Beaming a very large energy beam into the ground for an extended period can cause an earthquake. After all, an earthquake is the result of a sudden release of energy in the Earth’s crust that creates seismic wave resonances. The same array of antennas that are used by HAARP for ground penetrating tomography can also be used to penetrate deep into the ground and cause an earthquake anywhere around the World.
“Both propeller blades came off – the whole thing just destroyed itself. It just completely self-destructed.
September 5th, 12th, 19th & 26th is for Moment by Moment, a foundation that takes photos of terminally ill children. Karen Henrich’s foundation gives under-priveledged families forever lasting memories of their little treasures.
With time and effort, the social responsibility issues that beset Guide Corporation could be healed. However, by 2003 the company backed away from relationship recovery efforts. The fish kill proved to be part of a chain of events that lead to Guide’s complete shutdown in January 2007. More than 2,100 employees in three states lost their jobs.
I have come to a continuing realization I am in desperate need of the Holy Spirit, so that He can flow through me removing the excess I add to God, that I add to the message. Its an awareness that I need to live under, an awareness of the amazing grace and privilege our salvation and walk with God is, and how messed up and eternally dammed we would be without it. I prayed when I was on the SORJ ‘Help me scrape the barnacles I put on your cross.’ I feel that again is my prayer. That God would keep cutting me back to the word, the truth, the light of who He is. That we as a body of Christ would be so aware and humble that we would be incredibly malleable in Gods hands. That the motions and systems of life would not harden us into moulds He has not created.
I finally did something with this vintage table I've had for ages. I didn't take pictures along the way because I never thought it would turn out right. It took forever to cut out the numbers, get the spacing right, trace them on, fill them in with a paint pen, etc. The first coat of wax caused the numbers to smear and that's when I almost gave up on it, but two days before the show it finally came together.
The inquest heard Steven Shaw punched Mrs Wang in the face and pulled her hair to force her to watch as her husband was assaulted. He was left with blood streaming into his eyes from a head wound.
So I slowly open the bathroom door; my husbands shoe cocked and ready to be thrown at the roach. A quick search of the floor reveals that he is not down there. I move the shower curtain; ready for him to jump out when I look up. There he is perched on the shower curtain rod, probably contemplating how he is going to jump on my head.
Any suggestions? That don't involve links to Epicurious? Please?
Still, I think I'm satisfied with this and the companion piece. If not, I can tinker next week before I hand them in.
Oh and the irony of finding a stray cloth breast pad on my desk to dab at my eyes with... I take your rain on your wedding day Alanis Morrisette and raise you a breast pad to wipe tears while blogging about the end of breastfeeding... there's some irony for ya...
A sleepless night was spent tossing and turning, and imagining dire consequences in the inner sanctum of the village community room. Not only would I now have to face a questioning by the Parish Council in all its glory, but the Allotment Committee would also no doubt want their say, not to mention the Garden Club and doubtless various stray Coffee Potters who may have found themselves drawn into the fray...
What that means is this: when you need something important done and you don't have the traditional Black & Decker stuff or a large wad of cash to hire out or kids who are old enough to force into servitude, you think real hard and toss around the "What the hell, why didn't I think of this sooner?" phrase to quickly and efficiently overcome any obstacle. To be even more succinct, we don't know why we think up shit like this; we just do.
Know what's even more frightening?
This is a great "musing" and one that I am making my motto for 2012! I feel like I spent most of last year worrying about the things that don't matter and it took a toll on the things that do, family and friends. I have a tendency to stress out about every last thing at work which can be good sometimes but it can't be every minute of my life. I have made a resolution to keep work at work. No more email alerts, which keeps me from checking my phone after I get home. No more responding to client's text messages after work hours (which in turn creates an expectation that you are always available which we obviously can't be). Ok, sorry for the rant!
When the time comes for the film's third party, it's the girls' turn to cause some havoc at the Zebra estate. Employing disguises, Lucy (white leopard print coat), Carnation and Rosalind (thick glasses and paisley-coloured hippie dresses), the Valet Girls, with the help of Archie Lee, who, for some reason, is dressed like a French maid with a Dolly Parton wig, infiltrate Dirk Zebra's 50th birthday party (his seventh 50th birthday party in a row) with relative ease. Boasting a black and white theme (everyone in attendance is dressed in a combination of both colours), the comely party crashers plan to disrupt the proceedings by humiliating Dirk, Alvin Sunday and Lindsey Brawnsworth in front of all their coked up peers. In other words, a very public "fuck you" from all the women they have degraded over the years.
"In fact the majority of the ammunition was manufactured in the People's Republic of China between 1962 and 1974," the Army legal services agency told Diveroli in a letter on Tuesday notifying him of AEY's suspension from all federal work.
In view of the fact that we are still unable to get any mainstream publicity about our work, either on the TV or the radio, we contacted a senior journalist at the Daily Mail who has worked on UFO stories, and asked him what the problem was. This is what he had to say:
All this week we are striving (as if we don’t already) to keep the programs really simple and moving. The last secret ingredient to this recipe is intensity and that is entirely up to you, placing importance on your training and life goals.
BOKSBURG: Pastoral couple Meiring robbed by armed black attackers as they leave church.
After the Shackley meeting, Mulcahy was brought into the Libyan operation. Muammar el-Qaddafi had placed a purchase order with Wilson and Terpil for hundreds of thousands of timers capable of detonating explosives at some specifically delayed time. Wilson and Terpil did not tell Mulcahy, however, the real purpose of the devices; instead he was led to believe that Qaddafi needed them to clear mines from harbors and battlefields by safely blowing them up. The mines, so Mulcahy was told, had been left from the 1973 Arab-Israeli war. The timers were to be demonstrated to Qaddafi’s senior military and intelligence aides that June in Libya, and Wilson and Terpil had to find an immediate manufactu,er. They decided to exploit a long-time C.I.A. contractor, the American Electronic Laboratories of Colmar, Pa., and Falls Church, Va., which had routinely been providing the agency with some of its most highly classified electronics and communications gear.
We would head out on the balcony for the festivities we all looked forward to. In fact, there would be so much laughing and giggling the other adults in the front room would come and take a look to see what was going on.
Everybody seems so strong
Even though previous warrants are out for this man’s arrest, he was not listed on the SAPS public register for violent criminals. No, that is not the worst part yet.
They were not pleased to have a Democrat back in the White House in 2008, let alone a black one. They rose up in the 2010 election cycle as “tea partiers” and have by now pushed the GOP further right than it has been in more than eighty years. Even formerly sensible senators like Olympia Snowe, Orrin Hatch, and Dick Lugar are moving to the extreme right in order to keep their seats.
Dialogue: 6,0:09:30.49,0:09:31.82,Default,,0000,0000,0000,,You made that up, didn’t you.
He knows how to use everything on his computer, massages his own aching feet, and can always find his car keys.
I wanted to like this movie and maybe I’ve become a little too hard-hearted. I get what the wanted to portray but it wasn’t very well executed. It just brushed the surface of faith not the under belly of faith. They missed the mark on more than one occasion. I know it was just a movie but I wish they would have gone deeper than they did. It’s a start.
This is from Carson’s book The Cross and the Christian Ministry: Leadership Lessons from 1 Corinthians.
I actually have an irrational fear of bees (or really any large flying insect – anything that I can hear buzz), but this film makes me want to have a bee hive when we have a house. I will just need to get over it, because bees are too important.
Crowned dominant by day, but this night I switch
I've learned that you have to stay true to yourself. There are always compromises to be made in terms of what agents and publishers are looking for - but if you lose your vision of what you want to write, you might as well give up.
Eva
Stirring in the lemon juice and the fresh thyme just at the end gives such a fresh POP of flavor! The bright notes of the lemon were beautiful, the risotto was creamy, and the asparagus perfectly tender. A very nice harbinger of spring.
Where did the World War 2 spirit of “make do and mend” and all lumping together for the good of the country disappear to? Now all it takes is one word from a politician, who probably hasn’t seen a pasty since the older boys at Eaton put one down the front of his trousers, and were all kicking, biting and screaming to fill our tanks, kettles and Tesco bags with fuel; which apparently now is fine to stockpile in your shed or garage. Well Mr. Maude, I live in a flat so unless I’m going to store petrol under my bed I’m pretty stuck in that respect.
It’s now just 5 days to go til my climb and I seriously need to start thinking about how I’m going to get all the gear I’ve accumulated into the backpack and onto the plane.
Here is a professional’s tip. Whenever you are shooting a person’s portrait and they are the central subject, focus sharply on their eyes. If their eyes are in perfectly sharp focus, the photo will pass muster since we humans tend to look at eyes more than any other facial feature. If your depth of field is too narrow so that the edge of a nose gets a bit fuzzy BUT you have razor sharp focus on the eyes, most people will not even notice it!! However, if the conditions are reversed (nose is in focus but eyes are soft), most people will reject your image as “bad.”
8. Dusty Springfield "All the King's Horses" 3:04
listening when they say
The text ends with R. Yohanan stating that the timidity of R. Zechariah was the cause of the destruction of “their house,”[2] the Temple, as well as the exile, though the introducing verse states that it is because of the confusion of Kamza and Bar Kamza.
Prosecutor Michelle Zammit said there had been a level of aggravated degradation involved with the girl forced to lie on the toilet floor and the sex carried out without a condom.
-It is an amazing feeling to know that so many people are fighting the fight together
1/2 whipping cream or milk
I'm tired of being told that I have to pay more taxes to "keep people in their homes." Sure, if they lost their jobs or got sick, I'm willing to help. But if they bought McMansions at three times the price of our paid-off, $250,000 condo, on one-third of my salary, then let the left-wing Congress-critters who passed Fannie and Freddie and the Community Reinvestment Act that created the bubble help them with their own money.
For the month of may,i have decided to host icecream recipes..Kids love icecreams ofcourse and to beat the summer heat,we can all treat ourselves with icecream!!The event will be open from may 1st to 31st..
So, now I'm open to suggestions. How have you handled the Tooth Fairy at your house?
The Baron has been doing her bit to help, chipping in with helpful suggestions of debilitating fatal diseases that may be in the process of fatally debilitating me. Just this morning I happened to mention that my tongue hurt a bit for some reason, and that it seemed to have a lump on it. Her response was as instant as it was devastating: "It could be an ulcer." "I probably just bit it accidentally," I said. "It's cancer, undoubtedly," she said.
Tamarind juice, from 1 table spoon of tamarind pulp
1/2 cup warm water
“I never told you to put them up.”
The minute that we take our eyes off of God and put them onto this world we begin to lust after things that rust, and break, and fade away rather looking to God as our source of contentment. That's when we say ridiculous things like:
A lawyer and two friends--a Rabbi, and a Hindu holy man--had car trouble in the countryside and asked to spend the night with a farmer.
Our realtor told us, before we even out in our revised offer, that many times the highest bidder in a multiple offer situation won't get the house because they feel the need to ask the seller to make everything perfect after the inspection. I guess they think if they beat out all of those other people, they are entitled to everything being in tip-top shape. So while we weren't overly hopeful, we knew there could be a chance we could still end up with the house.
Nevertheless, these charges will be their undoing. Their greed has got the better of them.
I need a bigger apartment so I can have my shoes organized properly. There simply isn't enough space and it's a pain in the arse.
Cotton Mather had been the target of a few barbs in the newspaper Franklin worked for, the Courant. Cotton demonstrated his high level of character by informing Benjamin that he held no animosity or resentment for the pointed remarks.
Insert Luna’s face of dismay and anger, not to mention indignation. Lunas are dignified creatures.
Nicodemus
F: My Krishna name is Syama Manjari.
to say the least! Kaitlyn did a terrific job in carefully selecting the pretty papers, embellishments, and add on's in this month's kit, and it's a must have for your scrapbook stash for sure!
A simple way to evoke the "Happy Preppy" look, Annie explains, is to loose the pink and green cliches associated with the era. A two tone color palette, in a mixture of graphic plaids, florals and stripes creates an harmonious, pulled together room that is fresh and...well, happy.
Shoes is the theme over at Sepia Saturday this week so I thought I would illustrate it with a family shoe-tree. And at the heart of any such tree are your two immediate genetic precursors, your father and your mother. Or in the case of a family shoe-tree, your fathers' shoes and your mothers' shoes. So we will start with my father and this splendid pair of two-tone brogues which personify the 1930s like a chorus from Bert Ambrose and his Orchestra. I can't imagine my father wearing shoes like this : that staid disciple of cultural conformity could surely never have been a dedicated follower of fashion. But we have photographic evidence and therefore I will have to amend my preconceptions.
Forget about it! Head for the back of the liquor store—or whatever you need to do to escape further harm—even if you feel ridiculous because you’re a grown woman who spends a lot of time thinking and writing about spiritual matters, and you just ran away and hid, or even if you have been in therapy for PTSD for years, and wonder if the nightmares are ever going to stop. You don’t have to forgive, or forget, in order to move on. Getting stuck in believing that you do, could be the very thing that keeps ripping out your stitches and reopening the wound.
Even after 18 months on the team, I still find it hard to believe that a nobody like me was picked for such an elite team - really there are amazing people with incredible credentials on that team and me - I've never even taken a paper crafting or mixed media class. What did I know about such things? The DT call was advertised as a vintage themed challenge so I applied - well, yeah, I made vintage style cards. Imagine my surprise when I arrived at the team blog and saw the kinds of mixed media projects that the other designers were making - I didn't even know what gesso was!! I think the only Tim Holtz product I owned was a pad of Vintage Photo Distress Ink. Talk about being intimidated! But I dug in my heels, rushed out to purchase Tim Holtz's Compendium of Curiosities and dove in.
Monday nights have two very enjoyable milongas. Last year's favorite Lunes de Tango at Club Gricel was edged out this year by El Maipu at La Nacional. I didn't discover this milonga until toward the end of my trip, but it seemed like there was a little bit higher quality of dancers Monday night at La Nacional, quite a few of the dancers from La Nacional head over to Club Gricel after El Maipu closes.
Lewis Caroll, The Hunting of the Snark, illustrated by Mervin 'Gormenghast' Peake.
Zizi Kodwa, a spokesman for Mr Zuma, said Mr de Klerk had been misled by headlines. "Mr Zuma takes former president de Klerk very seriously but for him to just respond to headlines without checking the facts is very unfortunate."
I'll tell you right here and right now, this is a fun book to read. The description seems a bit silly, but the book is more of a look at an alternative post-apocalyptic world after the SHTF--that scenario us gun-owners are always prepping for. Or TEOTWAWKI (I think I got that acronym right).
After 21 days of no running, I went for a short run yesterday. I had to drag myself outside to run because I was afraid it would hurt. I started out slow and for the first 1.5 miles, things were okay. I felt a little "out of shape" from not running for 3 weeks, but things were okay. Around mile 2, my hips became really tight and I started to walk. I was able to switch between running and walking for another 2.5 miles and then called it a day. The pain was not as bad as my CIM pain, but my hip joints let me know that they were tight. Ugh! I am no where near back to normal. What is going on body?? Let's be injury free!
McConnell who spent much of his early manhood working for a block maker, studied part time at London's St Martin's School of Art until at the age of thirty he was finally able to realize his ambition of becoming a full time commercial artist. Like his US contemporaries Saunders and Ward he would have found a perfect home with the publishers of pulp magazines, but although such outlets were not really viable (or even existent) in 1930's Britain, the burgeoning paperback market was soon to provide regular employment.
Last Spring and Summer, at least a dozen people told me to read Game of Thrones. I put it on my Goodreads “to read” list and mentally put it in the sub-list I like to call “books I’ll probably never get to (reasons vary).” I’m sure those of you that love the series are asking, “WHY?!” I’ll tell you: 1. It was too long, 2. I usually don’t like fantasy–especially detailed fantasy, and 3. I’m naturally rebellious so the more people insist I read something, the more I’m inclined to say “no” just to be contrary. I’ll admit that these are terrible excuses.
Santorum: it’s amazing that I have not
Now, if the conditions during a neutron star's formation are just right, a dynamo effect can be set up which will not simply squeeze the magnetic field lines together, but actually greatly amplify them. This results in an object with a magnetic field thousands of times greater than an average neutron star - such an object is known as a "magnetar". Again, I believe the oft-quoted figure is that a magnetar at the distance of the moon could pull the car keys out of your pocket.
In their desperate need to be relevant on the world stage, Putin and his boys are claiming they have documents proving that Demjanjuk was not Ivan the Terrible. The documents would, I suppose, show that documents previously released by the USSR were forgeries of older documents covered up by them, and that I should now believe the new documents somehow prove something. It hardly matters. Demjanjuk admitted that he was a member of the Ukrainian auxiliary of the Nazi SS. The only confusion would be whether he was “Murderer A” or “Murderer B.” Neither deserved less than what Demjanjuk went through.
she holds on to sanity
Note: Star Wars Day falls on a Friday this year, meaning it is possible to stay up all night jamming to John Williams without having to go to work the next day.
Meir Sternberg
While out painting with Julie Trail on Monday we headed down Stringbean Alley just outside of Amador City, California. We decided to paint by the entrance to the Sutter Creek Gold Mine. It was a cold morning with a heavy frost on the ground and 25-degrees. Luckily the sun warmed the ground but since I was standing in a shady spot my toes and hands were cold. I am wearing my Muck boots on the next outing. The view was beautiful in every direction. This little painting, "Cascading Oaks" was painted near the end of the session with me standing on one foot and then the other, trying my best to stay warm. Seeing the muted colors of fall made for, "A Painting Day".
violet knee-hight socks
Slowly we tried to clear the area but it became apparent that without the aid of grown-up Tonka toys we were going to have great difficulty turning this into part of the garden. Enter heavy plant last September when Laa Laa and Tipsy-Dipsy spent the weekend moving soil and digging ponds for us.
The amount of money someone can make is unpredictable but if I were you I would check out the estimations being paid for every click. There are probabilities that a publisher banking $5-10 dollars for every click however this is going to be rooted in the type of words that has reached a high peak in its own industry. Google keywords may be expensive to compete for but they can also be the ones that you get paid from by using adsense. Comment and share advice on this matter
Antoine Bara (Lebanese writer):
It's no 2001: A Space Odyssey, but Jason X will always hold a dear place in my own heart. As the last proper Friday the 13th movie, it goes out with a damn big bang.
I want to welcome in the new year with a bit of a new twist on my blog. Writing is not one of my best points...I am a very visual type person...
We first wandered down the cypress-lined drive on a late spring morning in 2000, curious as to what the place was all about. Of course, we like to think we were their first customers—but probably not. Little did we know that the villa and adjacent properties had been sold-off over the years. Roberto and Sabrina stepped in to purchase and reunite them once again after years of neglect, into one grand estate. Although it had once been very beautiful, the buildings and grounds needed lots of love, years of hard work and money. Two dreamers who knew that they could recover this diamond in the rough, Sabrina and Roberto, shared the passion to make it all happen.
I know people who drink buttermilk daily and think it is delicious and some who thinks it taste so nasty, why bother with it at all. The benefits of cooking with buttermilk is one reason and why it is a staple in many southern kitchens. Added to baked goods it produces a tender crumb and a slightly tangy flavor. Buttermilk biscuits and buttermilk pancakes are two very popular, delicious examples of this. Buttermilk is commonly used in unison with baking soda or sodium bicarbonate as leavening for baked products. We all know how fluffy and delicious buttermilk pancakes and biscuits turn out!
Two days later he dropped the bomb. Daniel was a werewolf, and Jude might end up like him.
- the ability to bend over
Next, the chicken. This is ground chicken meat which has been seasoned with a kebab spice blend mixed with finely chopped onion and green chile pepper. In our case, we used a Seekh Kebab spice blend that we bought at an Indian grocery, but you could use any spice combo you like. Middle Eastern seven spice blend would also work, as would just a simple Salt, Pepper, Cayenne, Coriander and Cumin mix.
I’m older now and won’t be fooled by the contorted dolls they gave me anymore, by the hunchback servants, playing a tragicomedy for the hideous dwarf that I am. I know what that place is. I’d rather run away than let them lock me there.
Getting in: £8, or £10 if you take the class.
My practice sessions have been frequent ...
It's pretty simple really, I just dunked him in hot Rit Tan dye for a few seconds--once for 5 seconds, then I wiped it and decided to give it 2-3 more. I used about half the package in about 2 cups of boiling water. The mixture may have been quite strong in that case, David was recommending 2 spoonfuls. I tried it with Man In Black before I did Locke and I overdid it--maybe 12 to 15 seconds. Dumb. You can always go back if it's too light, but not the other way around.
Overall, we've had a great time. It helps me to realize that my family dynamic with a controlling mother feeds my own little control monster. It comes out with my husband and I do believe that at times I forget everything I've learned about my monstrous self. I've crossed many, many lines, been disrespectful at times and received a multitude of looks. The swats have been few and far between as he is very careful around my family. Good grief, I don't even want to know what would happen if we ended up in a conversation about the appropriateness of my husband giving me one handed swats.
Does your little girl have a brother? I will be offering either a matching tie ($15) or tie applique shirt ($12) to go with your little ones dress. These are going to be perfect for family photos or special occasions!
I have a layout to share that I made for the April 1st challenge at Once Upon A...Sketch. There's a beautiful sketch, and the journaling prompt is "Home." I started sifting through a pile of pictures that I've had sitting on my desk, and this one stood out to me. I have scrapped this one (or one very similar) before, but I felt this perfectly portrayed my idea of "home." We have moved 3 times in the last 2.5 years, and we do not own our home, so it really isn't ours. But I have learned that we adapt, and make wherever it is we settle, feel like home, because we are together and we are happy, and that is what "home" is, to me.
Thank you to everyone that joined in on our Spring/Summer Colors challenge.
I am SO READY for 2012!!!! It's going to be the biggest year for me.... I think! I have the following to look forward to:
*You can also add extracts like orange, raspberry or mint or add colors for hollidays!
He successfully brought the model of Edinburgh’s Free Fringe to London. You don’t pay anything as you go into the venue but as you leave at the end, if you liked the show, you pay whatever you think it was worth.
Ms. Hart on told me that Domino was her post-Katrina therapy. See, Mr. Conde - see what you're doing? By closing domino, you are abandoning New Orleans to the depths of despair....for shame. (maybe guilt will work on them)
I wore them until my friend said, "Holybabyjebus, I CAN'T STAND IT ANYMORE!! You look like a hobo! Give me those stupid, stinky, pathetic shoes. I can't stand to hear you shwip-shwopping around this place anymore. They've had their time and now they've gotta go."
Penguin Publishing Selling Author-Autographed Mini Cooper on AutoTrader.com
But then I replied that I have never run a full marathon all by myself. The two prior ones, Joanna has always been right by my side. And, all my friends who are running Vancouver this time with me are all much faster than I am.
I realized that I am among several families who have also been through difficult losses of referrals or countries closing down. I am NOT ALONE. And that is one thing that made this retreat so special. With the overwhelming support from others, you no longer feel alone.
But what they expect is definitely not what they get, and what starts out as fun turns dark and twisted after the discovery of a DVD with a sinister message: Vengeance is mine.
According to court documents, the unnamed patent office employee was a financial analyst who had access to accounts in which customers deposited funds that later could be drawn down to pay application expenses. That analyst has not been charged, and the investigation is ongoing, a federal prosecutor said.
I can almost picture it. Don’t stop now tell me more. What’s next after your hair? What kind of soap do you use? Do you have a scent? Do you use a conglomeration or just whatever is there? How do you apply it to yourself. Do you use your hands, a scrubber, a washcloth? How do you run it against your skin?
Croaking like crows here in the wind.
Buy Folk Clothing – Organic Materials With Attention to Details
Black boards with Gilt titling to the Spine.
But anyway, when did this happen? When did plugging in your phone begin falling under the “rude” heading? I would understand if I was attempting to set up an entire workstation–plugging in a laptop, phone, external hard-drive, and coffee-maker–but a phone? If you’re using the services of this building, and not just loitering, I tend to liken plugging in your phone to using their restroom, staying in their lobby a few minutes longer to wait for your ride when it’s raining, drinking coffee in a covered container while you wait, or throwing your gum wrapper or coffee cup in their trash.
all the time
This may come as a surprise to some of you reading this morning that, Yes there is a kinder gentler side here at CultFit. Over the past few years “our” clients detached from the inter-webz and social media have taken part in a rather old-fashioned means of communication, postcards! And finally due to much coaxing from these other member’s we have decided to present it to you!
24. Yellow Rose Of Texas
Milan Kundera - Laughable Loves - A delightful selection of short stories. As the title says it's about love, but not always in the ways one may expect. Very cute and easy read with a touch of affection and erotic at times, as well as absolute surprise in the opposite direction. Kundera is an old favorite of mine and I am glad I am revisiting his book shelf.
The White-crowned Sparrow is a medium-sized sparrow native of North America. Adults have black and white stripes on their head, a grey face, brown streaked upper parts and a long tail. The wings are brown with bars and the underparts are grey. Their bill is pink or yellow. They are similar in appearance to the White-throated Sparrow but do not have the white throat markings. That is what happened when I first saw these birds I got confused but not for long.
* I made a mistake and was embarrassed so I didn’t apologize as soon or as well as I should. My heart wanted to do better.
I know it’s been frustrating for some of you as you have to keep saying this to me over and over again, but I’m starting to get it now. I am beginning to understand that lightness is not external, that it is something that I have in me. Someone said it in a Sookie Stackhouse reference, “don’t let them take your light”. It embarrassing that this person had to go down to that level to make me see it, but thank you, Ophelia. And thank you to everyone else, for sharing your light with me. Another True Blood analogy is that fairies get stronger when they are with other fae. I get it now. Thank you my beautiful fairies (hopefully the men won’t take offense). Thank you for the light and love you’ve given me every time I am in your presence and a lot of times when I am not. Even the thought of you on a dark day can fill me with a sense of light. When you think of your achievements on earth, I hope you count how much you’ve touched my life as one of those achievements.
Rodney Erickson, the new President of Penn State, said on Thursday that this was the worst week in the history of the University. I disagree. The worst week was the week that the abuser decided to rape a child for the first time. Or maybe the worst week was the week we allowed a known sexual predator to continue to rape children. It could be that the worst week was the week we decided to cover it up.
Second, this will impact the industry in many significant ways, not all of which will become immediately apparent.
I hope to be using and evaluating this flow chart by May.
If the government did not insist on attacking its citizens with socially destabilizing immigration policies Peel Region would not be facing this problem. And it is a problem. Why? Because race matters! You can sugar coat it in all you want with the language of diversity and multiculturalism but what we have brewing in Peel Region is a race based power struggle. If all the immigrants to Peel Region reflected the host culture and society then there would not be a problem as they would have integrated and disappeared into the host culture seamlessly. But that is not what happened since the vast majority of immigrants settling into Peel Region could not have been any more different than the host society. And now that they have overrun the place they want a new sheriff in town because they say so! The threats could not be any more clearer on this:
David Buck – The Dead Drummer (Adapted by Haydn Middleton from an original radio script.)
Next up (after binding): Research track systems at interior decorating and garage door supply houses. I want this thing to slide out, completely flat, to one side so that it will serve as a wall hanging during times of the year when I don't need insulation from heat or cold.
So the plan:
I love fall. Without question, my favorite season of all. The crisp, cool, air, the warm sweaters, the fallen leaves, gorgeous orange pumpkins and warm, steamy cups of lattes and hot chocolates. What isn't to love?
“Can I trust you, Antonio? You’ve got me busted at Bogota, you bastard!” George whispered. He took out a dagger and slit Antonio’s throat swiftly.
So, Avon and Somerset Constabulary have been displaying on their website the cost to them of FOI. Only, it’s all a load of rubbish! The website contains some information as to how the figures have been calculated, but it transpires that the figures used were arrived at during an “informal meeting where no minutes were taken” resulting in there being no recorded information which can be disclosed under the Freedom of Information Act.
When I first opened the tins, I noticed that the product was not smooth looking like I expected. It almost looked curdled. I dipped my finger into the product to find that it has a soft, but gritty texture, not unlike sugar that has been creamed with butter. I did initially wonder if this would make it a terrible texture for use as lip balm, but I quickly realized the grittiness melts away on contact with your skin. The balms absorb quite quickly on skin, and leave only the slightest greasy residue when initially applied. Within a minute or two you are left with nothing but seriously soft skin and a sweet scent. On lips, they are light feeling, non sticky, with a glossy shine. They are not oily feeling and last for a few hours. I like them for use with drier formulas of lipstick as they both protect and moisturize but also add a bit of shine.
“Manmade earthquakes trigger government drill-down into possible fracking link”:
whence he will come to judge the quick and the dead.
because the government
Good Evening to all who are reading this,
Tests- 124, Runs- 8832, Avg- 52.57, 100s- 23, High- 280*
tip: I cut the recipe in half in the above photos.
“We must be 21st Century Buddhists, with full knowledge of Buddha dharma.
It's been a while. A LONG while. So sorry.
To be that big-banged 8th grader again with no fear of embarrassment over the words or simplicity of chords.
Sure, not every baby is a big sinner like Stan, but every baby is a sinner.
ollage. I love my little nugget. Seriously she is my pride and joy. I spend every waking moment of my life with her, and when i'm not with her, I'm thinking about her, worrying about her, wondering if she's napping alright, researching good mommy techniques on the internet, trying to find out if that bug she just ate was harmful, filling her wrists with dainty bracelets, filling her closet with yummy frills, filling her belly with homemade goods, filling her mind with books and music and imagination, wondering if this constipation will EVER subs
First of all, the US Supreme Court is involved in a Constitutional debate regarding the issue of wether or not the federal government can force a citizen to purchase a service. This is not a political debate. That's why it is taking place in the highest court in the land and not in a locker room or neighborhood tavern.
This outfit is the same Torrid top and SVOBODA jeggings as seen here, but paired with a new fabbbbbbulous cardi from Simply Be! The embellished shoulder is EVERYTHING.
Dan Le Roy apparently had much the same reaction, and this loving tribute to what remains one of my favorite hip-hop albums ever covers all the bases an adoring fan could desire: illuminating commentary by the practitioners involved, salacious recountals of artistic risks and career near-disasters, and a track-by-track breakdown that accomplishes the rare feat of initiating the newly converted and offering genuine food for thought to the long-faithful. A fresh perspective is guaranteed to even the most obsessive B-Boy fan, including the one writing this review.
BrooklynSpeaks, a coalition that said the plan should be changed substantially or rejected, stated: "We believe the incoming Spitzer administration must seize the opportunity in the new year to fix the project. The plan, particularly its second phase, must be changed to address its overwhelming scale, superblock design, lack of a transportation plan, and public process that has alienated rather than involved New Yorkers. "
Headed to bed. Thanks for stopping by :-)
We talk too much, love too little and lie too often.
Yet this is a running theme through all primitive earth culture, myth and art. And while science is beginning to access the bigger picture, we may be seeing a greater whole just in time: as the predicted solar maximum (increased sunspot activity, below) has the potential to return us to such tempestuous celestial activity as our ancestors experienced. Fire in our skies… perhaps eliciting earth’s (volcanic) response…
We the People demand forgiveness of all the debt. We demand the
Navy Commander: Fourth submarine to further strengthen naval force Watch: IDF receives fourth Dolphin submarine CIA: Without outside assistance Jews in Palestine won’t survive more than two years Barry Rubin: Why Occupy Wall Street Is a Disaster for the Obama Administration The Top Things To See In Israel In Google Street View
2 tales
“It is still much better than it was,” Brulee thought as she eased in to a stool next to the pod-like bed, and leaned against the rim of the bed, looking down upon her sister. “And she was asleep during the healing. She would not have to be aware of the pain she went through, so I hope.” And she was still well cared for. The Priests would work their healing power upon the prone, to keep their muscles from deteriorating completely, to keep them well when they could not eat; advanced healing spells that were far beyond Brulee’s ability.
I suppose that's the answer.
and that was that.
Week 15 Change: -0.6
Toast – Here’s to making new friends, and not pissing them off. I know that sounds odd… but if you haven’t guessed I’m rather abrasive at times, and generally speaking we should know each other a good while before drinking together because I have zero filter and seem to love to tell the brutal truth about everything. Including my own failings. So it’s nice when things work out and you meet people that are similar to you (or totally relaxed) and understand that you being a sarcastic bitch is just part of who you are. :D
Lets look at some options in the first round. There aren’t too many defensive ends the Bills should consider with the 10th overall pick. Hello Mario Williams? Dream on. Bringing in top free agents to the Buffalo area is next to impossible. Courtney Upshaw might be starring the Bills in the face at the 10th pick. Upshaw had an outstanding combine and put on a show in the BCS National Title game leaving with the games MVP. He would be a great fit for the Bills defense and be able to play with his old Bama’ buddy Dareus.
France ranks first in the Raising Children Abroad league table in the Expat Explorer report, with the Netherlands (2nd) and Australia (3rd). Children in these countries appear to lead a much healthier lifestyle and likely to be spending more time outdoors and playing more sport.
The two living heads of the Al’Craz family were polar opposites in some ways. Dwayne was a kindly old gentleman of leisure, content to trundle about his grounds and offer plainspoken advice, when asked. Evelynne, much to her sons’ dismay, was instead always keeping a weather eye open for potential matches for her children. Often iron-willed in her dealings with her children, she was nevertheless appropriately tender when things fell her way.
I could paint my toenails,
Doyenne of Edinburgh Fringe comedy critics Kate Copstick has an interesting piece published in Scotland on Sunday today in which she says:
Interleaved with his story are two others: of a single mum (Vanessa Paradis) struggling to raise a son with Down syndrome in Sixties Paris, and of a woman plagued by strange dreams.
Now, the easy explanation would be to assume that job growth is occurring in the, you know, manly sector: construction, mining, manufacturing, the heavy-lifting kinds of jobs. But what’s curious here is that men are also outscoring women in retail, professional and business services, education and health services (traditionally a female domain), hospitality and the federal government. And when it comes to jobs lost, men have also won the jackpot, losing fewer jobs than women in utilities, information services and finance.
— 8:47 (shockingly, I went reeeally slow on the runs)
Read and annotate chapter three of Lord of the Flies.
Dewey & LeBoeuf’s latest designated savior is Martin J. Bienenstock. The NY Times says that he faces “perhaps the most challenging assignment of his career: the restructuring of his own law firm.”
My hubby took my vehicle to work this morning because the roads were a bit slick. I drive the SUV and it just affords more protection in the snow.
El Nido was quite remote from most of the inhabited islands in the Philippines, its pristine beauty was hidden to the world until 1979 when a sea accident happened in Bacuit Bay. As the story goes, “a tuna line disabled a dive boat’s propeller in the middle of the night forcing it to drop anchor in an inlet. The following morning, the divers woke up to an amazing scenery of skyscraping dark cliffs, thick green forest, white sandbeach, sparkling water and, rising above it, a series of magnificently sculpted jade islands.
So although it may not fit in with the rest of the decor it can be used, and is a nice place to sit, despite being two different chairs merged into one monster, my wife has said she may cover it and give it a spruce up.
Alien Nation
The Citra Session Pale Ale
Through the barren trees
By the mid 1800s the same family who had bought King’s Mills from the Royal Navy and converted it from a victualling yard were still running the King’s Mills but it was a very different enterprise. Steam power had replaced water power for the process of milling and the mill pond was now used as a timber pond.
I like the size and shape...perfect for this project.
When we arrived at our hotel it looked familiar. It was formerly a Formule One hotel, where the accomodation is basic to say the least. There are no en-suite facilities (not that that worries me), but the WC and showers are placed at the ends of the corridors and remind me of caravan holidays. There's even that slight rocking as if you're in a caravan. Ah well, it's only one night and we have an early start in the morning.
I’m just going to say it. The people at Apple, Inc. are marketing geniuses…es….ess. (How do you pluralize that?) There was a time…before my time…yeah…that’s it…when the Mac had nothing on IBM. People looked at the Mac as inferior. All the cool kids had IBM (or IBM compatibles…Gateway, Dell, etc) and the rest…well, they had Macs.
First Published: Mar. 21, 2011 – Guardian
I want your voice to be heard. I want to know what makes you happy, angry, confused, and sad. In short, I just want to know what you think about anything. So, tell me. Over the next few weeks I want to do a web campaign called “This is My Story.” I hope that you want to contribute. Now is your chance to share yourself with all that will listen.
As we take action, in faith, to open the doors (gates) of our heart to the King and thus, recover our legacy in Christ, let us sing the appropriate words of praise to Our Mighty Savior and Our God…
1/2 cup soft butter
Meanwhile, the other young man has had a devastating experience. He doesn't know why or how, but he finds himself thinking about his own father-about the obligations of children to parents and, for that matter, parents to children; about the savage sadness that comes upon many people in their broken old age; in fact, he finds himself thinking about every aspect of his life in a new way. Does he want children of his own? If so, how will he bring them up? Maybe he thinks about becoming a physician; or maybe he's decided to call home to see how his father is doing, with whom he's had a difficult relationship; or, more likely, he doesn't know what to do but feels a sudden conviction about his plans and priorities that need to be revisited and revised. One thing he knows for sure is that he doesn't want to end up like Lear wandering alone on the hearth. In short, the world has been transformed for him while it remains utterly unchanged for his friend. And yet they have heard the same voices and words, seen the same bodies and props moving about on the same stage, or, to put it in mechanistic terms, experienced the same aural and visual stimuli.
Tell me, did I fail miserably?
But there’s a greater story
20 Middlemarch – George Eliot
There are girls already permanently encamped in our dorm's basement. They have staked their claim on their particular piece of table and set up a permanent residence, leaving their coffee mugs, books, computers, planners and schedules strewn about like so much detritus of war.
I used these graphics from the Graphics Fairy...
The President of the Republic is the Commander in Chief of the army and armed forces; and he issues all the decisions necessary to exercise this authority. He might delegate some of these authorities.
9) Similarly, remember there is no rule book you have to follow. All you need to follow is your heart, because when love is the driving force, you can't go astray. Like in the words of St. Augustine, "Love and do what you will..."
All this activity, in a tiny 4 x 4 square of yard by the back steps! I love our 'wild' back yard. :)
Some have mistakenly condensed their analysis and questioning regarding Palestine and the uprisings by asking when Palestine will join the “Arab Spring,” or when will we see a third intifada. But asking this question reflects a fundamental misunderstanding with the nature of resistance in Palestinian society and the role of its intifadas in the collective consciousness of most Arabs.
On the other hand, there is that coolness factor which overcomes the analog limitations. I arrived early to stake out a good table where I could work. Yeah, okay, so maybe it was the first table in the room, past which everyone else would have to pass. So I'm a childish exhibitionist with the Remington. What of it?
Bennie and I met for a decadent lunch at Gramercy Tavern.
I am so proud of those girls (and boys!), it's really a dream. I don't usually feel comfortable in vintage stores, but the atmosphere is just incredible. It kind of makes you wish you could grab your sleeping bag and spend the night. Here's to a successful grand opening, and an even more successful future!
Here are some images before the guys hit the stage:
This is why I’m not letting my fear of real estate investing get in the way of what I want: Financial Independence. Much like travel, I know the end result will be worth it, even if there are problems along the way.
Another local Craigslist find. $160! It needes to be reupholstered, however. That's where you come in! The photo is from Craigslist. The sofa is currently in my driveway. I am hoping the fresh, cool air will remove the smell of Fabreeze!
Madison Families for Better Nutrition is moving forward with several community educational opportunities. They have written and published a Healthy School Food Resolution. This resolution was passed by three Parent Teacher Associations, including Lowell Elementary, Gompers Elementary, and O’Keefe Middle School.
03 Misery
December 10th my builder got back to me saying they’d do a partial refund, but not the $3500 for the living room window upgrade. I called back and said I’m not agreeable to that. When we connected again, I explained their on-site manager had told me what I’d be getting as a refund, but it had been done verbally. Learned my lesson right there and then to NEVER do anything verbally, always get it in writing. The on-site manager was no longer employed with them, had left on bad terms so they couldn’t speak with him, but they mentioned that some gal in the office still was on good terms and would contact him. I was not a happy camper and could just see where this was going.
Do I love it when he cleans up the kitchen while I’ve been at Georgetown all day, even though I made the mess? Yes.
and has them inherit a throne of honor.
Press Service's Facebook page, you can post comments and share news,
“If my friend were to get hit by a truck
KID GOES OFF WITH AN ADULT — IT’S CALLED A BUDDY
I’m just a little surprised by how completely enamored critics have been with this show. The plot hinges on Lena’s parents cutting her off financially, which is fine, but they do it effective immediately. I'm sorry but that's not real. They’d give her some warning -- a month or two maybe. For a show that is supposed to be so authentic that is just a contrived plot device. And not one critic questioned that?
We are all dying.
The King's Speech won another award. Do we have an Oscar count? I don't remember. I know that Inception won 4 so far.
Ack! I just remembered, tonight's my turn to go pick up the sprats at 9:00 p.m. in a neighbouring town...*sigh* no rest for the wicked eh?
Weather they will know our look
Do you think it’s a bad sign that I feel this way after listening to the latest bells and whistles now available for businesses to manage their social media accounts?
dreads full of seashells,
24 War and Peace – Leo Tolstoy*
Dayton
Now we are seeing the growth of positive forces acting against integration, of vested interests in the preservation and sharpening of racial and religious differences, with a view to the exercise of actual domination, first over fellow-immigrants and then over the rest of the population.
I've been hearing the hype for weeks now. Everyone agreed this was France's year. France hasn't won in 34 years, but this time they had an adorable classically trained tenor named Amaury Vasili who sings like an angel. This year, the competition was France's to lose. (spoiler alert -- they lost.)
This leads back to the Everything I mentioned above. I am now at a crossroads. I have been searching for a job in the field in which I have training and credentials; as a matter of common sense and necessity, I am obligated for it.
“When they said Libya Free, they meant the cars, the refrigerators and the flat-screen television sets.”
Murdock found proper training under the Harley Race Wrestling Academy in Eldon Missouri and showed signs of success when he defeated Meng for the WLW title on April 11, 2000.
The truth is, the current ANC government is in power fuelled largely by the legacy of Apartheid, and they continue to use this as an election platform. In fact, because of Apartheid, the current regime has an endless list of blame, ready to be allocated for its each and every failure, and for the ANC, Apartheid is the gift that keeps on giving.
I feel honored to walk in a great show like this, with such a positive message and I would love to see more plussize runway shows.
It sounds like you and Mr. R have a different ethnic, ancestral background than Cadet. What impact do you see this having on your parenting and Cadet? How do you plan to address it? PACT?
sura-kārya-cikīrṣayā
MINIKISS featuring Hair Nation – 8:00 p.m.- Club Infinity
of student film projects and Iceland tourism videos in coming years.
In the summer of 1983, the day before William was scheduled to take his vacation. As he was on patrol, he sat at a red-light with an empty bag of Cheetos, he ripped the bag apart. People in other cars were pointing and laughing as he was licking the bag from top to bottom to confiscate all the yummy cheese crumbs. William was an oddball to say the least. He received a call that there was a drunk driver in the city. William loved to bust drunk drivers. He felt it was his calling. This could be because his mother was killed by a drunk driver when he was a little boy. His hatred for anyone dumb enough to drink and drive was evident. He began to search and found the suspects’ vehicle and pulled it over. Before he even went up to the vehicle, he could smell the combination of alcohol and marijuana smoke. “May I see your driver’s license and proof of insurance?” He asked the driver. The man didn’t look up at Officer Fink. He just handed him his credentials, hoping the officer wouldn’t notice how stoned he was. Officer Fink realized that the inebriated driver was the Mayor’s nephew, B.J. Boles. “Step out of the vehicle sir.”
Yesterday was my birthday. The day was this good. By noon, it warmed up enough for me to take a good walk around the block, even after a busy morning of Tai-Chi and housecleaning. I started Tai-Chi just a few weeks ago, a way to find my breathing, to meditate, to stretch my body and soul.
That’s something I had right.
Ingredients total = 3
I used my new favorite vanilla cake recipe from Sweetapolita. It's super fluffy, moist, and simply delightful. It's also not overly sweet so it's the perfect compliment in a frosting-heavy cake. I drizzled pureed strawberries over the strawberry buttercream on each layer to add a bit of flavor since the strawberries at the store are a bit lacking in flavor right now. There are a few components to this so it isn't something to throw together in a couple of hours, but I made the cake the day before, wrapped it tightly in plastic wrap, and it was still delicious.
“I own a Matchbox Motorway Set purchased in the UK in 1973.It is in working condition. Is anyone interested to own it?
5. On Monday, I got a great workout that made me feel sore in all the right places for days afterward! I love when that happens! I’ve got to go out and get a giant blue ball now…
Whether you sit on the front row or the back row or in the comfort of your own home.
TTM1 p.10-13
Thanks for all the comments last time. I really appreciate them (hint hint).
- Lemons 2 for $1.00 (USA, Sunkist)
It ain't so pretty...........
And then closed her eyes.
This is where I end the play-by-play, folks.
Nash never made it over to his age group,
So concerned with seeing the same, neither of us noticed the flaw.
Well, please pray for not only Joshua but my children at home (who I miss so so much) and my kids who still reside in the other orphanage. I worry so much that the wait will be to much on little Amelia. The doctor has given special instructions to the orphanage about feeding her 7 times a day and giving her specialized formula that was brought over by my friend Shelly. As you have probably read my other friend Shelleys blog on the condition of some of the children who reside here. Many of these children are the forgotten children and I truly hope and pray that Shelly and I made an impression on the caregivers so that they to can see how much these children need and deserve people to care for them. People learn by actions of others and our actions were truly from our hearts. We love these children and feel 100% without a doubt that our Father wants us to take care of them and love them in anyway we can. Thank you also to Dr Lilova, our faciliator and the MOJ of Bulgaria for bringing these forgotten children out. Pray pray pray.
The round system has another effect on pubs and bars namely making them incapable of policing any form of responsible approach to alcohol. One example being on one evening not long ago, one pal of mine passed out by the dance floor of the Krazy House in Liverpool, and was coaxed awake by another pal in order to be handed another pint of strong lout. He vomited but felt a lot better for it and was able to continue drinking. Nice and as I said, all the fault of Tesco.
An e-book may include text and pictures or no pictures at all. An e-tutorial usually includes text and pictures laid out step-by-step. An e-pictorial is a step-by-step instruction all in pictures and might be in a .PDF format or be in a slideshow presentation either on a picture hosting website or video hosting website. Or, it may be on an e-class website whereby it may or may not contain interactivity with the designer. All are digitally encoded then transmitted electronically over the Internet in various types of formats.
It has never been the same
Bucket list. I don’t really like that term. It makes me feel a bit sad. One of my all-time, absolute favourite magazines has a section in the front, where they interview chefs and foodie-type peeps and they ask them what they’d want their last meal to be. People salivate over this stuff (literally!), but it always kinda makes me feel a little bummed out. I don’t wanna think about my last meal. Or ‘things to do before I die’. I just wanna eat and have adventures and be happy and when my time’s up, I hope it’s quick and that there isn’t a giant pavlova I have to get through before I give life the ol’ heave-ho.
January: *writes a short*
It was raining again this morning. I'm running out of ideas for the kids, so when Virginia Mom suggested we meet up at the doll museum with a few other ladies, I went for it. It's definitely scraping the bottom of the barrel when I take Lucien ("What's a Barbie, Mommy, OOH, can I touch her boobies?") and Coco ("stop lookin' at me like that, punk, or Ima hit you with this Barbie") to the doll museum.
2010.08.22 Pakistan Peshawar 1 3 A civilian is taken down in a militant ambush.
BASSNECTAR/Vava Voom-This one is for you John and BJ! Electronica the way it should be…..Full of BASS!!!!! Ch…Ch…Check it out! “Do It Like This” is def worthy! And the beat goes on………
Me: So, what are you doing here?
When I first saw this fun collection of Donna's called Storybook, I immediately loved the sheet of eclectic images called Storybook Cards. From cute glittery fairies to army men and space motif's, there are images for all fun loving kids at heart.
I have used this as page one of my Orlando holiday memory scrapbook
Eric Hines
is yellow flowers.
Six quarterbacks were drafted in the first round of the 1983 Draft. Three of them are now in the Hall of Fame (Jim Kelly, Dan Marino, John Elway), one other helped lead his team to a Super Bowl (Tony Eason), and one more went to two Pro Bowls (Ken O’Brien). The only one that could be categorized as a “bust” is Todd Blackledge, but he did find success as an analyst for ESPN. The funny thing about that draft is that the quarterback drafted the lowest (Marino, pick #27) was the player with the most statistical NFL success, and the one with the most controversy surrounding him, due to a bad touchdown-to-interception ratio his senior year (17-23, compared to 37-23 the year before), rumors of drug use, and possible character issues. Also, the quarterback with the least amount of success in the NFL, Todd Blackledge, was drafted second out of the six, and was awarded the Davey O’Brien Award that year, given to the best quarterback in college football.
made a crash of colour,
Westveer K, de Cock JS, Heederik D. Fecundabiliteit en beroepsmatige blootstelling aan bestrijdingsmiddelen in de fruitteelt. Tijdschr Soc Gzondheidszorg 1992; 70: 577-584.
Brainstorm a list of everything a reader should know or remember about Tristan, our young hero, and his companions Robard and Maryam. At the end of each chapter make a prediction about what you think will happen next and why.
Hashbrowns or Roasted Potatoes? Roasted, I think. My grandmother makes a hashbrown casserole that I adore, but it’s definitely a special occasion treat.
1 shifting
If I ever stop sneezing and coughing long enough to get up from my sickbed and pack, I'll be off to Edinburgh on Friday for the Book Festival. My event is on Saturday, by which time I hope to have a voice. I've even made a PowerPoint presentation.
You always hear talk of how the “Illuminati” control the world and how they want a “new world order”. But, does anyone really stop to examine the evidence? There are just as many non conforming skeptics who want to stand out and be different, but fall into the same trap of believing everything they hear to the contrary of the official lessons.
You know that Yucatecan food must be really, really great if ceviche only makes it to the top 4. I adore this marinated fish or seafood dish and gobble lots of it in the U.S. but it's nothing like the fresh preparation in Mexico. Raw fish is marinated in citrus juice and seasoned with chiles, cilantro and chopped onions. Sometimes it's served with fruit as well, as you can see with the delectable passion fruit swirling around in the ceviche (se vee chay) above.
I'm announcing this first bottling run because I'm proud to get the ball rolling. Please do NOT ask me when they'll be appearing on store shelves. Just give us a few days to formulate a strategy.
We lived at Buchanan Dam, TX, for seven years while my husband served a church in Burnet, TX. When he retired, we moved into Austin to be close to doctors and stores and movies.
simmer for 2 to 3 minutes.
Winners will be chosen via random.org on July 30th, 2010. Last valid entry can be entered on July 29th, 2010 at midnight PST. Winners have 48 hours to respond before another winner is chosen via random.org.
“I am also a human being.” he smiled. “You made me suffer a lot last night sweet fairy.”
Subject: BTA mini-Digest: Tour de Fat is this Saturday!
This hand holds the wallet, and this hand will hold that super cute deer figurine.
“We have time for that, lets just have a good time this week. At least tonight, tomorrow night is far enough away.”
Thank you all for the love you've shown today. For those who don't know, my best friend Lara passed away unexpectedly last night. We are all in shock. Lara leaves behind two small children.
Since then, I’ve had several tech issues with the ScotiaBank mobile app. In both instances, the social media team has contacted me and provided tech updates, as well as support.
Between the year 1900 and 1975 the human population increased from 1 billion to four billion people. Now, there are 7 billion people, and there will be 14 billion people around the year 2050. There is of course a physical limit to how many people can be stuffed on the planet, and the road to that destination becomes uglier for each generation. Margaret Atwood played with an extermination scenario in her book ‘Oryx and Crake’. I hope no madman will try, because our species can not be exterminated unless there is a cosmic catastrophe, but humanity’s beautiful culture and science can be damaged by war or a pandemic. Education and welfare will automatically turn the growth rate, but many supreme beings and landscapes will be lost before we reach that civilized stage. Use your garden to save what you can!
The rosemary's grey-blue-green foliage has seasoned many of Hubby's culinary creations. Its winter blooms of brilliant periwinkle have provided much sweet nectar for countless honeybees, hummingbirds and other pollinators. When I see the blooms beginning to come out like they are now, I know that spring is not so far away.
“Could not resist the temptation to make you wait.” he laughed as they swam deep down the ocean holding each other’s hand.
But then i guess Saudi Arabia is a country where even though you might be able to find ppl of all different backgrounds and nation but still they all tend to live in their own bubbles. Well at least thats what ppl i spoke to at the event talked about the most.
Pssst, 80s, are you there? It’s me – Jinx - again. I was wondering; if you’re not busy, do want to hang out some more? We could play some Pac-Man or we could practice our dance moves to the top 40 I taped off the radio, or we could do each other’s hair and you could make mine look like Tiffany’s. Hell, yeah, Tiffany! Oh, I know, even better, we could wriggle into our Snoopy jammies and watch some movies. Yeah, 80s, lets do that.
should now reboot your system at the earliest possible opportunity.
From Chleinalp (km 64.3) it was a normal run again. The scenery was back to green meadows again, the path to normal cart roads and streets, the weather warm (about 15 °C), no fog and almost no rain. I enjoyed the rest of the race, running through very nice forrests until the end in Davos Platz after 79.1 km.
“This large-scale renewal is testimony to the strength, stability and success of a deep and diverse roster of top-rated programming,” said Nina Tassler, President, CBS Entertainment. “It positions us for continued success next season and certainly creates an environment that will give our new shows the best possible chance to succeed.”
Don't you just love the words in this? And aren't they unbelievably true?
Don't be afraid.
He says,”the boss is right and the most important thing is that I get fit and help Arsenal for the rest of the season”
David Wilcock has gone missing…after the Plejarans having deprogrammed him, it is feared he may have fallen back into CIA hands and/or cloned.
Zadeh HG, Briggs TW. Ionising radiation: Are orthopaedic surgeons’ offspring at risk? Ann R Coll Surg Engl 1997; 79: 214-220.
Decorating Magazines’ 7 Biggest Blunders
He put one in his mouth and said "Oh man, these are terrible."
I am calling this Day 9 even though if I had stayed on protocol it would have been day 13. After the fiasco last Thursday, I came off plan late that evening. So I took a break and stopped injecting. I started up with the injections yesterday (did not weight) and went back strictly on protocol this morning. So... I am considering this day 9.
Giving substance
He'll have to look further afield for someone to represent him because no local lawyer would touch him with a bargepole after his bravura performance in court when his lawyer had to restrain him from attacking the judge...quite apart from the sure and certain knowledge that he will not pay the bill.
- Make your way down the spawn hill. Get cover inside the trees. Do not approach the wall by the bus. Do not engage enemies at this point unless they are close.
The flower lady took advantage of very common marketing. The short process of creating a need or expectation and then providing the answer to it. I was in a conversation yesterday where we talked about expectations in relationships and also how one person always seems to be giving more in a relationship. Sometimes it’s like a circle, as with many relationship topics. One person seems to always be giving most of the efforts. Then, if that person gets tired of doing it, the other realizes he is missing something and starts to work to get the same attention as before. With expectations, I think people should be very careful and I think the world would be a much better place if every person was required to be counseled on the topic before going off into marriage or any committed relationship. I can recall expectations being possibly the most harmful part of the relationship. The growing expectations themselves and the failure to provide what was expected. If only people could learn before rather than after.
This also is becoming a very popular item being added to homes where home owners are environmentally aware or just looking to reduce costs. There are some concerns however:
A few months ago the Minister of citizens” Protection” wanted to build a fence on the border between Greece and Turkey. Today the Minister talks about 30 camps for immigrants with fence around them and without allowing (to the immigrants) going out of them. A party leader talks about mines on the Greek borders. That means Greeks against immigrants…
The basic process of making and transporting soup and its ingredients hasn’t changed that much over the last 46 years. The trucks are now refrigerated, bigger, and more efficient. Technology directs the process today. Produce is no longer raised on the Texas Panhandle but it still comes from American farms. I can’t pretend that the carrots in the soup are from our farm but I’m happy to know some American farm children can still make that claim.
"He passed fields, which still slanted, as in his boyhood. On the far hills hung the soft blue, remembered mists of abundance and fertility. The country had hardly changed. The grazing cattle inclined as always, their heads to the earth while the church steeples of his people still pointed to Heaven."
I’m a bit gutted that the main picture of Shaun is not in focus (the focus is on the front foot) and I’ve realised that I have to get my Bronica serviced as the prism and the viewfinder are way too dark, there must be tons of dirt accumulated over the years blocking the light.
How deep is Your love
Oh well. Guess I hope for the best, and plan for the worst with bribes for Noah and pharmaceuticals for me.
Gay dudes have more fun. I’m telling you, they do. Well, they do, stop arguing…and here’s how:
Florida
Some things are forever
Bathing suits on, goggles ready, sunscreen applied, but our plans were sadly foiled.
Mary Armstrong, president of American Federation of Teachers Local 420, which represents St. Louis schoolteachers, said she’s mostly concerned about charter school expansion. The district already has a policy allowing for teacher merit pay — though it is unfunded by the Legislature — and is working with the district on a teacher evaluation system that considers gains in individual student’s test performance.
Another use is when inserting sleeves, use the awl to feed the extra fullness of the sleeve to the armhole to avoid puckering.To do this the sleeve has to be on top,and the armscye on the bottom against the feed dog.
We are taken to present-day New York and now Crown Prince looks like Micky Yoochun on tour. How come there are no fangirls around him? Anyway, there’s a scene of Ha Ji Min being all cute selling fruit and Micky sketching her. Anyway, she gets distracted by a butterfly and some kids steal some apples and when they taunt her, she gets mad and throws one at them. But as one would expect from a kdrama, the apple lands on Micky’s head. She rushes over to him and he’s being helped by the second lead in Playful Kiss and while she’s there, those kids return to her stall and steal more apples. Really? When exactly did apples become candy bars?
As the chaos abated, and a thaw appeared, our masters told us they had arranged for forty thousand tons of rock salt to be brought from Europe. It should arrive here by next july.
Company F, 127th Infantry Reg., 32d Div., A.E.F.
Once I figured out what I needed to do, I put in a call to another friend. This friend is the kind of guy would feel fortunate to have. A guy you could never begin to understand the importance of. He is an advertising Guru. I wish I could tell you the circles he runs in, and if you met him, he wouldn't even tell you. But I'm sure you listened to their music, while driving a car he is associated with, on your way to a place he helped put on the map. Needless to say, he is kind of a big deal.
And…well, Wild Arms’s story is way more advanced than everything back then, and it’s even something which can stand up to the modern standards of time travel and that lot. I’m not going to go into spoilers, but all the characters have a huge plot twist coming in the future, and the story is even better as it advances into a very fluid and engaging sci-fi plot, something which was way beyond it’s time and still doesn’t have the reception nor appreciation it deserves.
Spilt Moong dal/ Split Husked Mung Bean: 1/2 cup
According to the January 2007 report there have been several complaints lodged against Metropolitan Who's Who and are categorized as follows:
There’s something to be said for this, especially for artists. The writers, painters, and musicians we remember are the ones who re-define their crafts by creating new genres. They are not necessarily striving to be the best in a certain arena — they want to create new arenas. They don’t want their audiences to merely be pleased by what they present. They want them to feel that they can’t get that sound, that emotion, those words anywhere else.
When we look at the prophetic passages dealing with God’s judgment on a people group we can see quite clearly that a disturbance of the luminaries is not an uncommon thing.
Mine needs a little touching up on the top and once that is done and we get it moved in its going to be amazing!!
Customers will also be able to send and receive texts and emails, as well as making calls.
This extraordinary racket is, at root, about the bewitching power of high-brow brands. Journals that published great research in the past are assumed to publish it still, and – to an extent – this expectation fulfils itself. To climb the career ladder academics must get into big-name publications, where their work will get cited more and be deemed to have more value in the philistine research evaluations which determine the flow of public funds. Thus they keep submitting to these pricey but mightily glorified magazines, and the system rolls on.
Its hard to keep pushing on but sometimes
As I’ve mentioned before in previous postings, it is pointless that I provide all the details of the how, why, and what, as readers can investigate these matters in their own time and pace, and decide for themselves if this business is a scam, or not.
No, global economic crisis or not, I refuse to be bowed. I reject the recession. I am a proud, card-carrying member of les nouveaux pauvres. Vive les nopos!
Beautiful museum dedicated entirely to the African origins of Brazilian nation. It proposes a trip after the hierarchy of those “orichas”, the born divinities after the encounter of the Christian religion and the animist.
Thanks MomSelect and Hexbug for letting me host a party!
We said good-bye today to a man from New Zealand and a woman from Argentina so beside myself there remains a woman from Ontario, Canada and 10 new arrivals from Norway. We had a lovely feast tonight under the grape arbor with amazing food and wine and orange colored olives that were a new experience for me. Everything is so delightful and new. Just how I like it.
Although the previous article did not attract the response I was hoping for (which may have been a blessing in disguise), I think the time is now ripe for that follow-up posting! Way too many strange things have been happening lately, and it’s time for some light to be shed on these matters, as it does not seem as if anyone else is doing it!
Thus, wouldn't it be nice if there was a piece of software that shutdown the Bluetooth listener if connected to Wifi? And if that Wifi goes out of range, turn off the Bluetooth again. If that leads to a connection, shut down the Wifi listener.
Buck unlocks the pantry door, and Rob runs screaming into the library with the others. They see the fake gore hanging off of his cheek, and everyone starts laughing again. Then Muffy tells her friends how much she loves them, and reveals why she set up such an elaborate plan in the first place...
I will always remember you. I will always encourage others to remember you too. It's hard though because the farther away from your birth/death we get, the less people talk about you. I will always say I have three children. I will never deny you no matter how it makes other people feel. You matter. You always have and you always will.
Your thoughts are now wondering what your future will hold. You get quiet for a minute….and, what’s this, “God are You saying something?” You finally got quiet long enough for God to speak and for you to hear. The words you hear bring you to tears. “I love you,” “I love you,” says the Lord. You proceed to tell the Lord how much you’ve failed Him, your spouse, and everyone else around you, but all you keep hearing is, “I love you.” “God, if You love me, why did You let all this happen to me?” You hear God speak inside of you, “You gave Me no choice. You wanted to do things your own way, so I let you.”
Crumble the sausage meat into a large saucepan and brown over medium heat, stirring often, about 4 minutes.
I could do to help out. So I started looking through
Do it for trentham Gardens
Then comes Akhil, who is from Chandigarh, and his recipe includes chopped onions both in the kadhi and in the dumplings.
The Javakh Chapter will serve as a liaison to the local population SOAR supports. The Javakh Summer Day Camp is directed by Very Rev. Fr. Babken Salibyan of Holy Cross Armenian Church and is located in the Diocese Center of the Holy Cross Armenian Church in Akhakalak, Georgia. The camp serves approximately 250 healthy Armenian children, who are mostly social orphans, living at or below poverty level in the nearby villages.
well mannered kids. Do you have any tips on what you do at home
I’ll pick a winner this Saturday, unless I receive a lame amount of entries like last time.
Eight Photographic & Electronic media students have combined and curated their work for the upcoming exhibition ‘DISSEMINATION’. The exhibition explores the interconnected nature of reality as well as the breakdown and the power of inanimate objects.
It was hanging in a hallway, but I decided to try it out in here. We discovered Rie's work when we spent a summer on Bainbridge Island, Washington. You can see more of her work HERE.
the pen writes the rhymes and the heart taps the rhythm
This album clocks in at over 66 minutes of music. Some songs are short and can lead the listener to wonder why they even included them at all, but in the end they have their place. They are not intro’s. Nor are they interlude’s. Imagine what New York City may be like at Christmas and you can imagine hearing a brass band or bells chiming a tune in the distance. Ambience.
only a stroll.
St Mary's also provided a site to care for the poor of the parish. Using funds raised from the local parish levy, a poor house was built and was in use in the seventeenth century in St Mary's churchyard.
That same week, my mom asked me to reprint a photo of herself on the farm as a young girl with her cousin. Right away I knew that Michelle's papers would be perfect for a pretty heritage layout, so I decided to make a page for my mom with her photo, aptly titled "Farmers' Daughters".
Overall, the doctor was happy with my progress. He said I’d gained a little weight – up to 16.9lbs from 16.5lbs 2 weeks ago. He told Mom that the weight gain probably signals that the dosage is better for me and my body is stabilizing.
"She's pretty tough." Maybe tough enough not to throw up, at least. The Four Knot was about as far from squeamish as a woman could get. A sudden bitter thought pulled his brow down into a frown. "I don't know, though. Since you messed with her head, she's been..." He waved a hand vaguely.
The idea to adopt “twins” for the artists who go by the stage names Jennifer Lopez and Marc Anthony and later for Ricky Martin came from our many references to Diana.
Look at this!!! I don't know where he came from, but if his snout shows up in this house, he's one dead dog walking! How come HE gets to stay with my Mr.??? And I don't! There is just something wrong with all that. I'm gonna grab him by the scruff of his well groomed neck and just give him a wee shake.
In India, over 47,000 cases of NPAFP were reported in 2011. The paralysis symptoms of NPAFP are practically the same as what’s attributed to “eradicated” wild virus polio. Apparently, vaccine polio viruses also cause polio paralysis.
And she's 15 years old.
If you don't think this is possible, go to a writers' group, creative writing class, or workshop. There, you'll be given an idea. (In fact, you'll probably be given many!) You might have to take it away with you and write it up for the next meeting, or if it's a workshop, you may only have an hour to write something. But remember this: everyone is given the same basic idea. But when it comes to reading them out, every writer will have applied their own experiences and thoughts to the idea, and you'll hear that everyone's final written piece is completely different.
But this time
It’s her, keepin’ me up all night again
Meant I had to stay home and look after the birds, set them flying for anyone who’d pay to watch.
Have a lucky day.
We spent a chunk of Saturday walking the gorge. Of course I took my camera; my friends got a little annoyed with how long I was taking… but being a photographer, I couldn’t help but stop to take pictures. I was taking a lot of long shutter speed pictures and multiple exposures for HDR images. After walking around the gorge for a while we went back to camp; we made some new friends that were there camping across the way from us.
Do you have any left over New Year's resolutions that are nagging at you? Do you find yourself complaining more than rejoicing? Do you need to write more? To whine less? To take your own advice and avoid people who make you unhappy?
The Church will survive the entrenched corruption and sheer incompetence of our Illinois state government, and even the calculated disdain of the President of the United States, his appointed bureaucrats in HHS, and of the current majority of the federal Senate.
Gingrich: if he wants to throw down believe
And full of spite and greed.
We have been planning to replace that fan for months. Over the summer, my girls and I took on a massive redecorating project. I had to pack up my entire home office, including the huge closet of office/craft/sewing/misc stuff and move everything to the living room so the office could be repainted. Once three walls were lavender and one was a dramatically dark blue, my 12 year old could move in and start decorating.
After dinner, we had Family Home Evening.. Jake was being disrespectful, and was sent to his room for early bedtime. But everyone else participated. We watched a video about having a testimony of the Book of Mormon (from President Eyring - SUPER good). I'd never seen it before! CPT did a good job finding it. President Eyring delivered it with SUCH emotion and heart and feeling.
“‘Don’t you want to join us?’ I was recently asked by an acquaintance when he ran across me alone after midnight in a coffeehouse that was already almost deserted. ‘No, I don’t,’ I said.” Franz Kafka
we waited, and watched . . .
The stall is usually manned by this friendly aunty with a warm, comforting smile. It just seemed to represent the image of Mr Yeo's grandma so wonderfully.
Thursday- Chalkboards outlined with crayons
I want to implement something new here on SMA called New Penpal Mondays. Every Monday I will post a penpal ad from one of my lovely followers or readers. All you have to do is send me an e-mail at: eveoftheworld@gmail.com with the following information:
I had the glucose test today. They didn't give me the results right away, instead I have to wait to see if they call or not. A call means I failed, no call means I passed. I'll be a basket-case until tomorrow is over hoping to not get a call!! Everything else at the appointment went great. Brooks' heartbeat was 149 and they said I was measuring right along. I got on the scales, saw a number I had never seen before and almost passed out, but my Dr assured me (after I freaked out) that my weight is fine and I have nothing to worry about. She also told me that my blood count was the best she had seen all week! I like to be a winner, even if it's just having a great blood count. They also gave me a flu shot today, so hopefully all the little germs will stay away from me.
that he is literally pushing himself off the wall, doing flips.
Kiwanda Cream Ale - The nose is malty with some floral hoppiness. The taste started with a mild maltiness next comes moderate floral and citrus hops. Finishes clean and dry. Nicely balanced beer. Fruity and refreshing.
How can you look them in the eye? Even be in their presence?
Hello! Hello!
Nothing to fear?
"And that was how the Kala's got their fingers into what would someday be the United states. Those fingers have only gotten longer and stronger as the years rolled along let me tell you."
talking of business, the progress
After many twisting, winding roads with tight hairpin turns, we arrived in Ravello, Italy late yesterday.
Rubin became CEO of one of the grateful hydra-monsters his initiative set loose upon the globe and went on to make barrels of money as his Citigroup traded the new, exotic derivatives made crazier by the legislation he'd spawned as a “public servant.” Unlike some of those AIG execs, he hasn't given back any of his tainted dollars. Meanwhile Summers, basking in the light of greed and idiocy, supported Republican initiatives to cut taxes for the rich, including taxes on capital gains, so we now have gardeners and housemaids taxed at a higher rate than the gazillionaire investors who employ them.
Daniel Zetah, a 35-year-old lead facilitator from Minnesota, mounted a bench. “We need to clear this out. There are a bunch of kids coming to stay here.” One of the hoodied men fought back: “I’m not giving up my space for fucking kids. They have parents and homes. My parents are dead. This is my space.”
Am I really being unsafe? I told my son today I would never ask him to
Well as I said in my last post my mojo had disappeared I have to say it's not fully back but it's getting there lol
“In the beginning there was nothing. God said, “Let there be light!” And there was light. There was still nothing, but you could see it a whole lot better.”
Saturday: Spaghetti and (Store-Bought :-/ ) Tomato Sauce
- Essence n.05 "Nude or what?" from the Season of Extremes TE
Anyway – I’ve been looking around various places (sources at the end of the post) and I’ve compiled a list of uses that seem the most useful to me. here goes:
Thanks to WordPress’ excellent method of tracking your blog’s stats, I noticed that many of the people who read that blogged clicked the link of the picture to film Melancholia, that I rented through Amazon although it was still in theaters.
Then realized the top needed to be smoothed and hardened,
And when we do so, we should not underestimate the power of the reciever to appreciate whatever little you share,
Cupcakes:
As the Filipino people.
On the other hand, she can be incredibly dramatic (which she just might get from her mama, who has a theatre degree.)
I read this quote today and it pretty much sums up what I’ve been writing or trying to write for the past while.
An interesting word – deserving – one that has caused much grief and heartache in your world. It is this thought, this feeling on which success or failure is hinged. You can be the most accomplished person in the world at whatever it is you do, but if you do not think you deserve success, it will elude you. Most of you come into this life as somewhat pure, we say somewhat because for many of you there is a lineage of certain pains and heartaches that you carry within you on a cellular level. But unless and until this is activated it lies dormant within you. So, as a young child, if you are nurtured and made to feel good and special, then this layer of doubt and fear that you may carry deep within you will not emerge. You will instead, emerge as a self-realized being who believes in their self-worth, their specialness, their deserving of everything that comes your way. On the other hand, how many of you heard fist as a child, then later in life that you were not good enough, or smart enough or pretty enough or whatever? We know there were other slurs and put-downs and not all were verbal onslaughts – some were physical as well. We are here to tell you that none of that is true and it never has been. You are ALL good enough – in fact you are all at your truest state, in your core, perfect and divine.
for more details and to reserve your place.
Police minister's slush fund secret
I enjoyed reading all the comments. THANKS for visiting my friend's blogs also! I hope you found some new ideas there. I am planning on visiting some new blogs myself and adding to my blog roll.
I'm a bit obsessed with my camera and Photoshop...it gets worse by the day :)
With White: Fence Posts- Make 4 total
With ecstasy comes clarity, accelerated into obscurity, Thoughts clouded by sex, emotions run on high tension. Ripping through doubt with indecision, no real comfort. I have no desire, no passion, when will I connect? Moving in and out of reality with blurred lines what’s real and what’s fake? Materialistic way of life soothes for only so long, when will I connect?
Here at HaltCreative, we’ve signed up with Mailchimp to distribute our newsletters to both our artists and our customers. My first impression is that it’s an amazing service, with lots of useful features, incredible tracking and statistical information, and it’s very easy to use as well.
There is so much more I could write on this subject and I will without doubt be writing more soon.
Hello Everyone! JustRite wanted to be sure everyone knows that they are making room in their warehouse for all of these fabulous new 2012 CHA release stamps sets, which is 21 new Cling and Clear stamp sets, with 2 new Custom Dies! So they are having a $10 retirement sale to retire all their JustRite Original 1 5/8" stamps and 2" stamps! You can click the graphic below for more details:
In Think Christianly: Looking at the Intersection of Faith and Culture, it is obvious that Jonathan Morrow has his fingers on the pulse of todays current (and rapidly changing) culture and not only makes a the case for why Christians and the church should be engaging culture but offers a lot of great advice on how to go about it.
And that was after conditioning the beer for a month on French oak soaked in dark rum and dry-hopping it.
I hear Steve and Andrew talking through the open door.
Also love spending time with my husband hes gone to do Hajj and i will miss him, always miss him a lot and get realy bored when hes gone even for a lil bit :p.
For the first card I drew a double border with a thin black pen. I then centred a nestability die cut fancy label shape and drew around it with the same fine liner and coloured the negative spaces in black. I left the die cut shape in place as a mask and masked off the border with post-its. I stamped a penny black image from the "trims" collection in a variety of inks and added matching stickles to each as the image resembled fireforks to me and went with the celebratory feel of an engagement. I stamped a Waltzingmouse sentiment in the label once I removed the mask and finished by adding some square black gems to the corners.
Just email me at pangeran@pangeran.org or use the contact form.
So, this little glitter egg project started because when I was home in Minnesota for Christmas, my mom and I stumbled upon the cutest ceramic egg trays, and my mom kindly decided that they needed to be mine. As many of you know, I have absolutely nothing to do with real eggs (it's a story that goes way back...) so why on earth would I covet little egg trays? Well, because I pictured the little dishes filled with all things bon bons, dipped homemade marshmallows, mini desserts and well...glitter eggs.
Of only one loss,
I can't help but wonder how much more I might have liked The Neverending Story if it had been given to me by someone I cared for and remember with affection. It's similar to disliking a name because it reminds you of an awful person: not the name's fault, but undeniable all the same. Do you have any books where your own personal experience, unrelated to the story itself, left you with a less-than-good feeling about it?
Magdi Allam was born in 1952 in Egypt, the son of Muslim parents. He received an education in Catholic educational institutions in Egypt. He completed his degree in sociology in Italy and decided to stay in Europe. As a journalist, he worked for major Italian newspapers, most recently as deputy editor of Corriere della Sera in Milan. In 2006, he was won the one million dollar Den David Prize for Understanding and Tolerance. He converted to Catholicism and was baptised by the Pope at the Easter Vigil 2008 by Pope Benedict XVI and received the Catholic Church. Through the television broadcast of the Easter liturgy, the event became known worldwide and led to some angry reactions in the Islamic world. Since 2009, he has been a member of the European Parliament. He was elected on the list of the Italian Christian Democrats. Due to their cooperation with the party of Turkish Prime Minister Erdogan, Allam founded his own party. In the European Parliament, he is a member of the national-conservative, Eurosceptic Europe of Freedom and Democracy Group.
here are some fun wedding pictures for your visual enjoyment...you were just a dream then but we somehow managed to still have an absolute blast. daddy and i are still surprised at how much fun we had that day, and how our parents helped us to have the most perfect wedding we could imagine. thanks again grandaddy, gigi, grandypa, and susie=)
Cracked wheat being "soaked"
Sharing another great idea from the Stampin' Up! Fort Worth Regionals today.
Light Multi-Grain English Muffin, Sugar Free Blackberry Jam, and Decaf Hot Brewed Green Tea and that started the morning off right! Throw in the newpaper and I’m set. I always use Healthy Life Original Light Multi-Grain English Muffins and Smucker’s Sugar Free Jam The breads are always fresh and the Jam is fantastic! You can’t tell it’s Sugar Free and comes in several varieties. I’ve been drinking Green Tea since 2006. I really enjoy a hot cup of Tea and the health benifits are a plus. Time to eat and read the paper.
Oh, this interview also explains his run in with the Michigan DNR that led to him putting down his own pigs, and equally insane events on his game ranch in Texas.
We are then stuck with the corporate bland, bland, boring, another FPS, another RTS, with ever more expensive commercials on TV telling us that this FPS/RTS shitty product really IS different, and fun, and when we buy it, we pop it into the disk drive, and we play it, we discover that it is the SAME shit, the SAME game that we have played for years and years and years.
Some day god willing we will achieve our goal.
Sunday: Strength and cross-train
A few more facts, that not only indicate that ME is a physical condition, but also that it is caused by a virus:
Almost a year back I had written a post on “Getting the best from your team: Where does one start? – I” where I had explored a couple of ideas that a startup had applied towards building a great motivated team.
Of course we won’t know the full facts even when the Official Inquiry is completed. The mine is closed, and important evidence is lacking. So if the Inquiry was always going to whitewash the Company and Govt this is now certain. Meanwhile our solidarity should be for the workers families and not for the parasites that turned this disaster for the miners and their families into a face-saving exercise for the ruling class and their NACT regime.
It's funny, I'd been looking for nesting tables, and when I want something specific, I rarely find it. These little tables were perfect for my needs...which include a "hen party" tonight and a buffet for a dozen of my favourite women. So they had to be READY...and they are! I re-glued and stabilized and did all the things we "trash to treasure junkies DO..." stripping, sanding, redoing...you know the drill! I thought initially that I'd paint the whole table, including the top...
Essence I ♥ Extreme Volume Mascara (Ultra Black)
Like other phobias, Eepistolaphobia, just reared its ugly head, got a hold of me, and held on. For those who don’t know, Eepistolaphobia comes from E joined by the Latin word for mail – epistola with phobia tacked on to the end and means fear of email. (I made the word up. I like it.) Email totals continued to climb until I was petrified. I knew I’d never be able to read them all. I couldn’t organize them into folders. People were texting and asking me to read their emails. I didn’t know where to start.
I return to childlike innocence
Amazingly, this is one of just four JDM novels that was never translated. Well, five if you count Weep for Me, which I don’t because it never had a chance to be translated. The other three I can understand because they were only so-so, but this one? It’s a shame.
You cannot get a certificate to operate a business unless you grease the palm of a politician. You cannot get contract unless you know a politician in the ruling government. You are treated differently if you know the regional minister, the district commissioner, governor or the district chief executive (DCE). A French investigation into corruption at the former oil giant Elf Aquitaine, an executive testified that Elf paid £40m a year to Bongo via Swiss bank accounts in exchange for permission to exploit his country's reserves. Source: The Sunday Times, 2008.
the drawstring pj pant bottoms are so cute and flattering, they have a pretty border, hit the ankles, and the drawstring waist is also elastic for when you need some give..
1 fathers
1/4t salt (I prefer kosher)
Radical anti-business black activist. Affirmative Action and Job Preference for blacks. University of Maryland Business School Dean; teaches that US business has caused world poverty. ACORN board member. Communist DuBois Club member.
I looked at quite a few different options before buying these ones. They're not the highest quality, but that meant they weren't as expensive and they still got good reviews.
Reason #2: I love writing about firsts. When you’ve kissed someone hundreds of times, it’s not that exciting anymore, but the first time . . . Well, it’s a kiss to remember, for good or for bad! And the first time someone holds your hand, the first date you go on, the first time your heart is broken, the first time you sneak out of the house to do something you shouldn’t . . . Life goes on and you can forget what these things feel like, but pick up a YA book and an author can make you remember exactly what that moment felt like when you were first there.
outdoor patios, a favorite spot for patrons to relax and imbibe.
The University of Maryland is committed to creating a supportive, safe environment for our students and our community. We are showcasing that commitment this month through various on-campus campaigns and events for Sexual Assault Awareness Month.
-Not a good reputation
As we speak, I have a terrible sense of foreboding, because last weekend a stunning omen occurred in this country. Anyone who thinks symbolically had to be shocked by the explosion of the Columbia shuttle, disintegrating in the air and strewing its parts and human remains over Texas — the president’s home state!
I awoke this morning from a dream in which I was holding Nora. This was the first time I’ve dreamt of holding her (that I can remember). As with all of my pregnancies, I logically know there is a baby in there, but it isn’t until I am actually holding that new little life that I really fully comprehend the great, unimaginable, unconditional love between a parent and child. There is nothing like it. That blinding love was right there in my dream. My cheek rested on her soft little head and all was right with the world in that very moment of blissful happiness.
Now, the usual patriot answer is that “wee the people” have somehow let down “wee the people” by not marching on DC with our NRA-sanctioned sporting arms and straightening out “thee the people” in those high offices. Again, this sounds good, but the fact it has NEVER happened, and NEVER will, is due to one simple provision in all of that power stuff we usually skip over while paging one-handed over to the good stuff in that Bill of Suggested Rights If They Aren’t Too Inconvenient When They Matter Most.
Perserverance over Impatience,
4.Thanks for Helping me Grow - This was another fun teacher gift to show our appreciation at the end of the year. I know teachers don't need any more "stuff" so I planned to give them gift cards, but needed a creative way to display it...they loved it.
Ahsan, 15, says the P-word could be classed as racist if used by anyone else, including other Asians. Last year filmmaker Navdeep Kandola was forced to change the name of his work from Paki Slag after Screen Yorkshire threatened to pull funding and criticism from West Yorkshire Police.
An alcoholic is released from Strangeways prison near central Manchester. He immediately spends his money on tobacco and downs a bottle of sherry, and as he gets to the city centre he sees the aftermath of a riot. He goes into a smashed-in Krispy Kreme and helps himself to a box of donuts. A horde of riot cops turn up and arrest him, and he gets 16 months in jail.
Is it really all we need?
The countryside stretches out to the horizon on either side of the freeway. Mile after mile of cornfields roll by for hours on end at a 75 mile-an-hour clip. The vast farmland is punctuated with small clusters of human population and slopes littered with the dark outlines of cattle. It brings new perspective to how rich our United States of America really is.
Edited to add: Thanks for all the emails about how the comment button wasn't working. Hopefully, she's good to go now. :)
We had an amazing turnout, including BFFs Gail & Kenny all the way from Albuquerque, and a fun time was had by all. Eamon did a number on his smash cupcake!
Happy 4th of July!! Besides celebrating our independence from the English, today is also my grandpa's birthday. Every year my family gets together for his birthday with BBQ and all. After that, my man and I are going to a party at a friends house to celebrate more and watch the fireworks. And just after celebrating our country's independence from England I'm going to get even more excited about the British Royal Couple's arrival in Los Angeles. Ironic right?
The topic on this one for today is "What Homebirth Means to Me". *warning - c-sec triggers*
Marian
561420 Telephone call centers (including telephone answering services & telemarketing bureaus)
I couldn't deny that I would feel the exact same way. I had wanted to go to him but I was so overwhelmed with emotion I could only think to run. Try to escape somehow. None of this was his fault and I didn't even give him a chance to help.
This was another story - a great October read - with a bit of magic, mystery and maybe some murder thrown in. Bloodroot had me turning pages late into the night, antsy to find out what would happen next.
and We’re not trembling
This picture window was interactive during the whole time we were there. If people ordered a Uh-Oa! the the tiki gods were angered and there was a huge rain storm like the one in the Tiki Room. When someone ordered the Krakatoa Punch, the mountain in the picture turned into a lava spewing volcano, etc. It added to the fun of the evening.
It’s fighting against the system and exorcising self-doubt. It’s dealing with taboos. It’s the preconceptions and misunderstandings about autism. It’s the acidic remarks of a thousand Daily Mail readers talking about feral children, bad parenting and invented conditions. It’s wondering if they might be on to something. It’s thinking back to those MMR vaccines and allowing yourself one moment of indulgence in the Wakefield theory, and then reminding yourself that you have two perfectly normal children who both had the same jabs.
My splashed wordy vitriol with a propped confidence and no outwards insecurities?
4.Food products (cereal, macaroni, candy, marshmallows or other perishables) also should not be used
2. God will be an enemy to your enemies. “But if you indeed obey His voice and do all that I speak, then I will be an enemy to your enemies and an adversary to your adversaries” (v 22). –Divine protection!
I've noticed these are terms which elicit strong emotions. Many people haven't heard of either, but ask for a brief explanation (which I am NOT good at providing) or discuss it over a period of time. Depending on their personal understanding, experience and the people they've met, reactions vary widely and I've seen family, friends and strangers dismayed, awestruck, horrified, intrigued, quick to judge, interested, worried, skeptical, undecided, curious, relieved ...
Racing pregnant has been a blast! I have been somewhat forced to stop and smell the roses or perhaps, the aroma of sweaty runners, and notice a few things. Oftentimes, athletes forget all too quickly what a race can give back to us: fellowship, sharing of achievements, and the reminder that we are all in this world together trying to be better people. As a coach and fellow athlete, I continue to witness everyone's observable capabilities, as well as those that lie hidden deep within all of us. Whether you enter a race to win, to conquer a goal, or to share an experience, you will find that every challenge asks us to step outside our comfort zone. For me, slowing down has been an enormous step outside my nice and cozy comfort zone. But by welcoming discomfort, we discover those hidden talents, strengths, and gifts that lie unnoticed within us and awaken to recognize those roses we forgot to stop and smell. Everyday, step outside YOUR comfort zone, and unleash your potential!
Luckily, this afternoon will be my last hectic one, and then work will calm down somewhat. PHEW!
Ben: I did actually sketch for Kate but the designs weren't published. The dress was modern but also celebrated the pageantry of the day. A fitted bodice to accentuate her long figure. The bodice was covered in French ribbon which was frayed and knotted to give it a really modern but classic twist
Guilt.
Coolidge married Grace Anna Goodhue, who was a perfect match for Coolidge. Outgoing and gregarious where he was reserved and reflective, he was very much in love with his wife. He wrote in his autobiography of Grace, "We thought we were made for each other. For almost a quarter of a century she has borne with my infirmities, and I have rejoiced in her graces." In 1924, shortly after receiving the Republican nomination, Coolidge suffered a personal tragedy. His son, Calvin, Jr., developed an infection and died suddenly. Coolidge later remarked that "when he died, the power and glory of the Presidency went with him."
Then once again apply glue to the bottom circle and stick down. I usually use a pair of tweezers to grab the centre and twist it a bit once I have glued it but before it dries to tweak it to exactly how I want it.
Xmas is coming! Part of me dreads Xmas, the cost, the stress etc, but in recent years our little family has developed it's own traditions and rituals around celebrating midwinter. I have lots of plans to make lovely things; cakes, biscuits and all manner of tasty treats, handmade gifts for the children. I love the children's infectious excitement and anticipation. I love how the whole period from Xmas eve to new year feels like down-time. I love relaxing after the mad rush and not feeling that I should be doing something else. Relaxing by the tree with a hot drink, some tasty treats and a pile of good books, surrounded by happy children is what I look forward to the most.
The Event
Annie: “Who is that?”
Freshcraft at 1530 Blake St. offers a nice selection of 20 beers on tap, and a solid selection of around 100 bottles. The food at Freshcraft looked great, however we were only there for beer. Odell’s brewing had a firkin of Imperial Barrel Aged Porter sitting on the bar. I’m a sucker for firkins and Odells is one of my favorite breweries. Despite the Odells, I couldn’t fight the temptation--I opted for Russian River’s Temptation Ale, aged in French Oak wine barrels. Thanks to one of our friends who saw the firkin, I did get to taste the Odells Imperial Porter, and it was magnificent.
Kilpatrick agrees. ”I don’t know if there’s one that is specifically set in Canada,” she says. “These writers aren’t focused on Canada; they’re focused on a type of writing: dark fantasy.”
Shopping for the bathing suit made me realize why my mother and daughter do so well together shopping. My mom always insists that everything gets tried on. My daughter thinks everything needs to be tried on. I prefer to pick a couple of items, different styles, have her try them on, and pick the best to buy. My daughter wanted to try on everything. It doesn’t matter if it’s the same style as something she has already tried on. I did it her way. I let her try on everything she wanted to, and then we picked out the best one. I don’t think I have ever spent an hour shopping for a bathing suit before.
Dies: Go Kreate Frilly Frame, nestabilities label?, Magnolia Doohikey Tilda lace die, Martha Stewart butterfly punch and nestabilities lacey circle die
My direct moment of inspiration came when I heard Kat’s cheeky, confident voice speaking the first two lines of the novel into my ear. (I was in the middle of chopping onions at the time - and in the middle of writing a completely different book!) I raced to grab a notebook and capture her words…and I just kept on going from there, because I really wanted to find out what would happen next!
Simply, payday advances might be obtainable, immediate, and handy lending options which have been appropriate adequate in meeting any limited-time economic crisis, and this can be accredited within just hours, very. This mortgage is the response to an critical will need have a tendency to transpires in the heart of the thirty day period-just when there is no need anything remaining from the prior wage any more.
Thought 1. I am very glad it doesn't occur to me to cook like this all the time. I mean, I love my Thanksgiving recipes and mercifully seem to forget all about them except for once a year.
the University of Abuja. He
Ok, that was my quick check-in. Sorry for the short post, but I have LOTS of work to do! See you soon! And in the meantime, please enjoy a small peek at the birthday celebrations... :)
Starting up initially with newspaper advertising, press releases and articles or advertising in business magazines can provide limited coverage to prospective clients. Effective publicity is the key.
(Hmm, does this mean this quiz originated in the States? Perheps.) Out of those two I’d say Borders, because they’re actually vg and I got my Swallows and Amazons mug from there. And they have armchairs dotted around the bookshop which is the way to my heart, and they didn’t kick me out when I sat there for five hours in Adelaide reading City of Flowers (it was raining outside and the museum was very small). But if we’re talking high-street bookshops, I used to like Waterstone’s the best but now they’ve put down that horrid cream carpet and it doesn’t feel as nice. Now my fave is the Heffer’s on Trinity Street in Cambridge. That’s just lovely.
We really loved these, but we were on quite the sugar kick yesterday. They weren't sweet enough, so we added some sugar to our liking. It's totally your preference with the sugar thing, but our sweet tooth is a very needy compared to some. This recipe makes A TON of smoothie, so if you want to slice it in half, you'd still have plenty of drink to go around.
And Smith's article takes the issue to another level by illustrating (right) the shadows the buildings might cast. (Any shadow imaging analysis is somewhat complicated because shadows would fall for only certain hours.)
Donna Summer – “Queen of Disco”
There are broadly two ways to measure the power consumption:
I got over my fear of a body part being on the cover, I didn’t want it to be sexual in any way, but I don’t think this is sexual really. Apart from my debilitating phobia of feet I like it. Please let me know what you think, thanks.
The gene clue was found in a Pakistani boy -- and members of three related families -- who had become a local celebrity as a street performer, stunning crowds by plunging knives through his arms and walking on burning coals.
But getting back into exercises. The last time I failed a PT test I was recovering from pneumonia and just couldn't breath during the two mile run. I was ashamed and embarrassed. Once my lungs cleared up my run time went back into my normal range and all was well and good. Except that I'm not obsessing about getting better on my PT.
So I’m not sad. Even if it stands no longer, it will always have a place in my heart.
I like eUndies not only for their adorable underwear at great prices, but because they carry sizes that fit more than the average woman. That’s right, they have plus size underwear and cute ones at that! eUndies was generous enough to send me 3 pairs for this review. Wow! One of these pairs was the Darling Diamonds Bikini, pictured below in brown. Mine actually was brown and it’s very nice. The inside is soft and comfy while the outside is cute and sort of shiny. The brown has some diamond print on it with a cute little bow on the top of them. This is a really nice pair of underwear! I have worn them several times now and have enjoyed wearing them each time. They don’t bunch up or give me any wedgie issues. ; ) Also, they are only $2.99 and they come in navy blue as well! How is that for a deal?
SO... a big thank you to Michelle Allen who created this wonderful clock that has seeped its way into my subconscious over the last 12 years. Hopefully the bracelet (?) that I traded you has made you as happy as my clock has made me!
(April 24, 2012)
Look, I get that some people don’t understand that being who you are isn’t really a choice. However, you either be yourself, or you pretend you’re someone else and suffer-along in life. Maybe I should put things into my own perspective…
Well thanks for stoppin' by and you might want to scroll down to find out about a FREE Digi Stamp Set from Totally Stampalicious as well!!
2 large russet potatoes, peeled and cut into 1/2" cubes
Transport Workers Union members will vote May 10 through May 14 on American’s last contract offer, which would slim planned job cuts by at least 2,600, to 5,900, the union said. AMR Corp.’s American said its offer would save 3,100 TWU- represented jobs.
Rest in Peace!!!
“Sunday’s Bersih 3 demonstration is no doubt the biggest and the most violent in the series,” stated Dr M unequivocally.
Dis_em_barK
I am committed to my goal, but what's happening here may well weave itself in a highly fictionalized form into my story.
Anyway, since then it's been with Saskia, Jérôme and Eric, the musicians who are going to give it its first performance on Friday, June 15th, in the little 9th-Century chapel called the Prieuré de St Julien, below.
This will happen also. In our house, it seems that the second my husband and I start a conversation, someone needs or wants attention and the whining begins. This is also normal. Young children especially, want our attention and when we are giving it to someone else, they will naturally try to get the attention back with them. Turn to your child and explain you are talking to "daddy". "As soon as I am done, you and I can talk." This teaches them manners. That you are aware of them. That they don't need to whine, that whining won't get them what they want, and that your spouse is also important. All valuable lessons for children.
They were proud of themselves and their position before God, unmindful of their sin, which separated them from the Lord.
When it was someone almost breaking into you without asking permission, who saw into your soul without you asking for it, it can be a very vulnerable thing. It’s finally facing another person, as you are, whether you like it or not. The road to feeling safe living in this space of openness can be long and frightening if you don’t have love to guide you, heal you and keep you safe.
It wasn't news to me that Santa didn't exist or that my father was an actor. But the combination of my reality and my imagination being forced to exist simultaneously and consciously was just too much for my young brain to cope with.
Oh, gentle reader, you have arrived on an auspicious day indeed. Not only is this my very first book review (on this blog, anyway), but my very first giveaway, too! You have to read to the end for the freebie part, no cheating.
Potential Insights: This will explain in greater detail how exactly they are preparing from an athletic perspective.
"You can't curse around her. She's too good of a soul. Pure at heart. Her skin slows, and when you're around her, you think about going to church again."
The Eye of the World is book one of The Wheel of Time®, Robert Jordan’s internationally bestselling fantasy series. This edition features cover art by David Grove. The art, which originally debuted on the e-book, will grace bookstores for the first time on this handsome trade paperback edition.
Monte scored big with novelty hits. Admittedly some really could get on your nerves. Seventeen light hearted tracks for when you’re in the mood.
So much has happened since the last time we wrote you, so forgive us if this letter is long!
Top the enchiladas with the remaining enchilada sauce and top with desired amount of grated cheddar cheese.
Also, the weekend is upon us and I hope you all have the best couple days.
Album of the Month: The Liberation Of, by Ladi 6.
The Quick Delivery Service
When will Americans learns that elected Tea Party officials are allowed to be governed by a completely different set of rules than us everyday Americans? I want to know what kind of Tea the Party is brewing and who is drinking it. All Rand Paul had to do was get through security at the Airport in Nashville.
Would you f****ng believe it. On top of everything else, I was out delivering election leaflets in my own road last night, for the GLA elections. I'd just turned the corner from Newcombe Park into Millway when bang. Given that I'd not touched a drop, for a second I was perplexed. This feeling was soon overwhelmed by excruciating pain. A huge hole in the pavement had caught my foot and I thought for a second that I'd broken my ankle. The irony of it is that Councillor Brian Coleman, the man who I'd been delivering leaflets to unseat is responsible for roads and pavements. His incompetence had nearly broken my ankle.
In the quirky yet compelling 1988 movie, The Accidental Tourist, with William Hurt and Geena Davis, we hear about wearing yourself into a groove in your life that can be tricky to get out of even once circumstances change.
This innate navigational tool is, I believe, put to use in many areas of life, not just art, and it has an awful lot to do with trusting your gut and sifting wheat from chaff.
Stain your memory with my thoughts and all that was spilt was this ink.
1: $20,000???!?!?!?!?!
While I'm at it, please take a look at this:
I figure I needed to get around to making a post about this as well. I’m game . It’s always interesting to see what kind of ships we all as capsuleer’s collect and keep around in our hangars based on how we all each play EVE. As well just what exactly is in that super secret hangar of yours. Fortunately for me this was a fairly easy task since I tend to keep an organized hangar try to keep my asset spread low.
I tried to measure up and purchase a curtain pole/curtain combo before, and the procedure went like this:
A printing cost of £3.92 and a cover price of £5.99 leaves £2.07 potential profit, of which I would receive 60% (£1.24), with 40% (83p) going to YouWriteOn. If I published the book myself, I would receive 100% of that £2.07.
Yes, taking steroids to enhance athletic performance is wrong, but a lifetime ban seems unfairly harsh. I mean, essentially, you’re consigning someone to the scrapheap just because of one mistake.
I’m the first to admit – I don’t generally go in for musicals. The songs get on my nerves. I like the dancing (unless it’s the Hollywood-western, red gingham, square dancing kind) and I do like some musicals – My Fair Lady (1964, Rex Harrison, Audrey Hepburn) is fabulous. But in general, no. I do not like musicals. I really like Singin’ in the Rain.
Stir Tang into juice. Add Lemon pudding. Mix and stir well. Add fruits and stir until blended. Refrigerate. If you want to be more elaborate you can add cut up bananas, dipped in pine- apple juice and drained maraschino cherries.
Personally, I would definitely make that drive three times a week if I weren't working. But at this point, with two kids, sleep schedules being what they are, me in a new job, and only one car, there was really no way to make it work. What a hand-wringer . . . something I KNEW he wanted that I really had to say NO to. I knew he would be angry, sad, betrayed . . . and I had to plan the timing and content of that conversation very carefully. Mustering up all of my compassion and courage, I sat him down to have "the talk".
Upon being awakened, none of the three men retained any memory of their mental experiences while in the hypnotic state; and they were exceedingly surprised when I read my notes to them. At Aloysius' request, they all promised to return the next day, when the experiment would be continued.
I'm down for the cast drawing programme that goes until April 20, then portrait drawing followed by still life. In amongst these are the continuing Bargue exercises on Monday afternoons. It is unlikely that I will be able to move on to painting in this session, but at least now that day is finally looking like it will actually come. It's a great feeling, after so much delay and uncertainty about the future.
I'm officially desperate and need help!
When I was home last, I told daddy about something I've always always wanted to do. I love my home. I love Turlock. And I wanted to photograph it.
I seriously can't take any more reflection right now, unless we're talking mirrors, which I don't really like either because my hair needs to be re-dyed.
The film hauls itself along at a snail's pace, further padded out by unnecessary dialogue between Lane and Poli. In fairness to D'Amato, his background work as a cinematographer shines throughout, scenes are perfectly framed and the camera work is crisp.
Cancer Society $0.22 for every dollar raised. Admin costs for the Terry Fox
19. If a Zhu-Zhu pet gets stuck in your hair, your only option is to bludgeon it.
As I describe each of the other principles of building relationships keep in mind that effectively integrating them all is the key to good communication. As I said earlier they are rarely found independent of each other but I want to be sure to emphasize key aspects of each principle.
The adverts were due to start running last week on London buses. The slogan, “Not gay! Ex-gay, post-gay and proud. Get over it!”, was a response to an ongoing bus advertising campaign being run by the gay rights group Stonewall which states: “Some people are gay. Get over it.” Within two hours of the Guardian revealing that the ads had been booked, they were cancelled by Johnson, who said: “It is clearly offensive to suggest that being gay is an illness that someone recovers from and I am not prepared to have that suggestion driven around London on our buses.” His rivals in the campaign to become the next London mayor, Ken Livingstone and Brian Paddick, also condemned the adverts.
So...if you want a quick buzz, you can go cheap. If you want something really interesting and flavorful and fun and good with that dinner you've got cooking...craft is now available in all aisles.
If you asked several years ago, my answer would have been: No.
Which they didn't. Miserable buggers.
Isle of Skye Wee Beast -- not heavy enough
However, are the headlines themselves actively under reporting the true scale of Asian involvement in this crime?
In the second verse, we hear bell synth play in the quieter sections of the song through the right channel, which causes a growing, melodic line in the measures after the bells demise that start on the left hand side of the mix and makes it’s way toward the other side as the rest of the verse goes on. It then explodes into one of the most important pieces to end the second verse and make way for another, brighter layer of instrumentation that appears during the second chorus of the song and if you’ve followed this complex session..you would’ve guessed that it outputs through the left speaker.
Lemon Glaze:
Each year my husband and I take turns looking for something fun and new to do for our anniversary. Last year was my turn, and I happily stumbled upon Carefree Adventures operating out of Simmie, SK of all places (yeah, I didn’t know it was there either!).
It takes a while sometimes to see where the story starts, but I think it starts here:
I might laugh,
Cons: I cannot remember when any of these holidays are. I will never remember when these holidays are. It is a lost cause.
To start off with, print out the template. I have given you 2 sizes, a larger feather and a smaller one. I will have all measurements listed for both of them.
*Rice noodles come with varying cooking instructions. Often the instructions say to bring water to a boil, turn off heat, and then add noodles to hot water for 2-8 minutes (depending on noodles and use). That is great but most the time I’m too lazy to bring out a second stockpot. You can add the noodles directly to your broth but depending on noodles used it will likely make the broth cloudy. If adding the noodles directly to the broth they should soften in 3-5minutes, taste them for tenderness.
To put it simply, there is No Such Right.
It is hardly a surprise that eventually they got the answer they wanted -- the response that made their life a whole lot easier given Chinese banquets for visiting Obama emissaries were waiting and Hillary Clinton was coming to town. And yet astoundingly Obama officials expect us to believe that the atmosphere at the embassy was one of "no pressure".
I've completely neglected most of my goals for 2011. I usually do not like to commit things in writing (hello commitaphobe) which is why I haven't shared my goals with anyone anywhere. I suppose it's the fear of disappointing people if I don't attain a goal which, as part of the whole codependent thing, can be detrimental to my self-esteem. Or, at least, it has been in the past. One of my goals was to write more here. Obviously I haven't done so well.
Your colour this month - Asparagus
When we out the girls in Ty and Cayd gave a look of What the hell? Apparently it was their time and didnt want to share it lol.
I have a dear Italian pen pal (you know who you are cara Renee :-)) who is so graciously teaching me
Step 3: You should see results.
9…brand yourself.
The full moons peaking thru the clouds.
next is stroller, convertible car seats etc ;-)
For instance, yesterday she came home with this dancing star certificate
During the Crown College Graduation Ceremony, each graduate receives a Servant Towel. This is to remember the example and directive that Jesus gave his followers in the thirteenth chapter of John’s Gospel.
- 33.2 lbs. Still loves to eat!
So this was our first test run of a baking bee. Now the plan is to invite more people to join (and maybe to get more things done?), and double the amount of bread we bake, to make one week’s supply for both households on one go. And to do this once a week.
I'm not philosophically opposed to having a Christmas tree, it's just hard to rearrange for one, and every year we seem to be busy with other things (this year, an unschooling symposium starts December 28).
Just kidding, not to worry. I’m not the same rebellious kid that shrinks off in the corner, and rubs my hands together (evil genius-style), thinking “Well, if that’s what everyone thinks, and that’s what everyone wants, then I’ll show them how bad it can be!”
Remember to thine own self be TRUE, for out of the abundance of the HEART, the mouth SPEAKS… speak life and be true!
Books? I am still reading “Isaac’s Storm” by Erik Larson. Great book. Love the stat’s, stories, science and history told by the author.
7. Spread bread crumbed in one plate and beat the egg in another plate. Season both the egg and bread crumbs if needed.
So I'll turn things over to Navin Johnson:
35 A QUARTER of the world's armed conflicts of recent years have involved a struggle for natural resources.
April 22
It might seem I'm being overly dramatic. But please understand that to me, what happened was pure gift. Not something to be proud over so much (though I was proud of how reverently my son handled his duty), but an unexpected gift to be humbly received.
We're certain we'll pass this situation... we don't know when and how,, but we'll do our best. Stay positive & optimist!!!
ITKYI Blog (itkyiblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Yes, you can take a brain dump on other things besides paper. I personally use Google Docs. You can use whatever works for you.
Turtleneck: Target
Request No. 1
Etsy Weddings has everything organized to perfection. From paper goods and decor to dresses, rings and accessories, you will find it all here with ease. Everything you need in one place! Even outfits and accessories for your wedding party. Just when you thought that was enough, there are plenty of blogs, stories, advice and real weddings you can read about. This is the placce to be when planning a wedding.
The rocking chair was my big splurge for the nursery. Pottery Barn makes such comfy chairs, I couldn’t resist! We chose the rocker over the glider because this one came with chair legs, so down the road we can use the chair in different room. Brilliant idea PB!"
You are all heroes. I appreciate every single one of you. The men and women, US Soldiers and Coalition Forces alike, risk their lives around the world for our freedom and our safety. I am eternally grateful for your sacrifices. They will never go unappreciated or unnoticed. I have been blessed to have many military men and women in my life and I would like to take this time to thank them personally. To Luke, Ben, Deryck, Josh M, Taren, Brent, Robert, Carlos, Erica, James, Chad, Tim, Anthony, John, Nick, Dom, Josh D, Kirky… Oh boy I hope I named them all… (Please blame the concussion if not. I’d feel horrible.) To all of you, my friends, my family, you are my own personal heroes. I am blessed to have you all in my life in whatever way we are connected. I am so proud of each of you, and admire your strength, determination and passion for our country and the citizens you protect. Thank you so very much.
“In Oslo (Norway), all sexual assaults involving rape in the past year has been committed by males of non-western (non-white Muslim?) background; this was the conclusion of a Police report published today. This means that every single rape assault in the last five years, where the rapist could be identified, he was a man of foreign origin.”
Hold your head up
the event was watching the Gym Dogs perform!
Hi, friends! I hope that you all had a fantastic Thanksgiving. I celebrated the holiday with the BF's family and we had a wonderful time. It is truly humbling to recognize how fortunate we are and to express gratitude for our blessings.
Santa was sitting on a love seat, where we’d positioned him with Lizzy for some photo ops. Lizzy was indifferent to the guy in the red suit, and instead, she chose to focus on the Christmas tree in the corner of the room. I suppose it was better than her screaming while on Santa (“No Santa, she’s not normally a demon child. She deserves better than coal, I swear.”). She sat quite comfortably for awhile while I took a lot of photos and prodded her to do something other than stare vacantly at the mesmerizing tree in the corner.
Haite Rouyue
I wrote the above guff over a year ago.
Thurs 10:30-13:30 and 14:00-17:00
2. Jungle - no progress
I combined all of this in a bowl with a whisk and then left it to stand a while to marry the flavours while I got the toppings ready.
It took me a while to finally watch this movie again, but I'm glad I finally did. Boyle's movie is an instant classic in the zombie genre, no doubt. It's a fresh take and one that is worthy of watching with some friends to maximize the scares and thrills. Very recommended.
Some of the technology that will be used to turn against the conspirators is highly classified and highly effective. Most people will probably never know it was used.
knew father's fine pacer
How do you tie your shoes? The right way or the wrong way? Did you even know there was such a distinction?
Signs sorrow up into immortal spheres.
If after both these attempts have been made, and you still don't like beets, then you can say "Ewww beets!" I doubt you will.
“Why are we stopping here?”
But the central point is that it is not for the ANC Youth League or any other political grouping to decide the ANC president's guilt or innocence -- that is the constitutionally determined job of the judiciary.
Becca Feeken
"All of our theatres equipment at NUH goes through a thorough checking process to ensure everything is of the highest quality and within sterilisation dates." Look, Adam, no-one's suggesting that it doesn't, or that it should be any different. What they do expect is that your surgical staff should ensure they have everything they need to hand before they start searching for a place to stick the epidural.
U-T San Diego says a 911 call came from the home at 10 a.m.
Coop/Charlotte: Coop is still having problems with Mason, but now that the boy is speaking, he’s not listening to his father. Charlotte, still stinging from Coop’s “not his mother” comments, gets in a few digs about willing to help if she were a parent. Coop half apologizes, but Charlotte is still waiting for the real deal. Charlotte also advises Coop to get over his own needs and to be patient with Mason’s petulant attitude. In the end, after Mason witnesses Melody’s interactions with her parents, Mason seems to rethink his attitude and cuddles up with his dad to watch a movie. They invite Charlotte to join them and Coop finally apologizes to his wife, realizing she is indeed going to be Mason’s parent.
Unfortunately Elianto has since moved out from Singapore,
Even breath could not conceal the heart’s deepest membrane.
So these are two bringing the total to seven.
Please reframe call your ex when you are going on getting back together after a break up. Let things cool down, steady your emotions and work on thinking about what happened to cause the break up. getting back together after a break up is going to mean correcting what went wrong and restoring it before you call them back. Work on rectifying the relationship in your mind, and do not call your ex until things have normalized in your heart and head as well.
I started to make this card, yesterday, but got interrupted.........you'd think somebody would have invented a switch that could be flicked to clean the house, do the ironing, go to the shops.........it's the 21st century, after all.......and I remember, as a child in the 60's, being told that all this would be possible in the 21st century, and we'd also be holidaying on other planets!
as they both bit into their homemade cake pops . . .
People with disabilities face many barriers every day, from physical obstacles in buildings to systemic barriers in employment and civic programs. Yet often the most difficult barriers to overcome are attitudes other people have regarding people with disabilities. Whether it is ignorance, fear or misunderstanding, these attitudes keep people from appreciating and experiencing the full potential that a person with a disability can achieve. The fact is, people with disabilities often accomplish the same tasks and have the same experiences as those without disabilities.
In the weather section of today’s paper, the New York Times has the sun rising at 7:04 AM and setting at 7:05 PM. These things do shift around slightly (it has to do with that leap year stuff and the times are averaged to the nearest minute) but other years you will find the Times reporting the St. Patrick’s Day sun rises at 7:06 AM and sets at 7:06 PM. Yesterday, the Times reported that the sun rose at 7:06 AM and set at 7:04 PM. Nominally, with whatever averaging is in play, that’s a three minute difference: This is the time of year when New York’s days lengthen at their most furious rate.
Here she is in the layout I made with this challenge; In the pocket holds my words to her as well as the lyrics to a song Martina McBride sings called "In My Daughter's Eyes".
Perhaps I should try things that I find easy.
Please add your Permalink below
Coloring the bottle and milk are the tricky parts. The bottle and milk are colored with B32, colorless blender, C1, C3, and a hint of Y11. Once I add the background I will add some glints of light with my opaque white.
EH: There are certain people that you want to buy for. He was taller than me so he didn’t need me to buy him food.
“Sometimes I dream of a rush of angry consumers tossing Homer Simpson Chia-Pet Heads, plastic singing fish, and chocolate fountains upon the trading floor in protest to all the crap that is created with a cause for profit, not need,” says Amy. “That’s my dark side.”
Carol of the Bells
What I loved: The classic love story and gothic tone of the story.
I am rapidly typing a very quick post whilst supposedly doing very important things!
When your going to school, working on your next project, and trying to make a difference try your very best to focus on clarity. Can you tell me what your purpose is in one sentence? If not then you’ve got some work to do.
As for cleanliness, I wouldn't say that it was a lot cleaner than the typical McDonalds Play Place. It was smaller and more cramped, but less crowded.
Good morning - It's time for another Sweet Sunday Sketch Challenge! Here is the deal: make a card with this layout and use the InLinkz button down at the very end of this post to enter your card. The links will close on Friday at 10 PM (Mountain Time), and I'll randomly select one card to feature on my blog on Saturday. So, as long as your card is linked by 10 PM Friday, your card will be in the drawing. Be sure to link directly to the blog post or gallery image which features your card. You may post a picture of the sketch on your blog, but please save the image to your computer first. Use the keyword SSSC115 if you plan to post your card in an online gallery.
Who inspired little No. 9s and little No. 99s
scored with traditional notation, can only be gestured at
Toth has talent - raw, intense, challenging (in its questions and observations), and he's willing to risk alienating otherwise friendly readers, kick them in the brain to get thinking about things that (he thinks) matter.
Well that is all well and good but we have just had the wettest April in 100 years.
3. The Red Button - As Far As Yesterday Goes
I wish I had picked up that phone call from Pramod. Maybe I could have been of some help and maybe. . .!! But it’s too late to dwell on maybes and what-ifs.
2. Feet sweat, no matter who you are.
But of course, there’s a lot more to FRIDA than great tasting entrees. We like to create an “experience” at our restaurants and an ambiance that’s fun, lively and always entertaining. Case in point, the decorative murals at 236 South Beverly Drive. Back in November 2010, we commissioned artist Candida Peña to completely remodel our interiors, adding blue and metallic colors that perfectly encapsulate the “Casa Azul” of our namesake.
“You logged in at 9.36″ she said.
Ethology: What am I doing to get here so far? Nothing. Ideas to help me get there -study animal books and movies.
Follow the instructions for preparing the chocolate glaze, omitting the chocolate chips and decreasing the hot water to 3 Tbs.
I once knew a civil servant who had the power to grant or deny the right to demolish old buildings. He was at the height of his powers in the late 1970s, and he simply couldn't see the virtues of buildings designed in the 1920s and 30s, when he was a boy. To his eye, they were cheap and ordinary beyond belief. So it was on his watch that the Firestone Building on the Great West Road disappeared in August 1980.
Are you enjoying it? Do you have nice offices? Have you been out to a few yummy dinners recently? Are your kids nicely dressed?
Early At-Door Registration and Pre-Registration Badge Pickup will start before the event at 9:00AM Saturday September 29th, 2012. If you pre-registered, please make sure you bring your PayPal confirmation page and ID with you when you come to pick up your badge; we will not be able to give it to you otherwise.
This lovely Yellow plant is called Sweet Broom, it smells just like my Winter honeysuckle. They both share a yummy citrus scent... The cashier at the Homedepot warned me that Sweet Broom can quickly become an enormous bush!.... I had intended to buy two of them but, put one back after her warning Lol!...
Responsibility and blame: Don’t we all love this little juicy carrot? I have developed a highly sneaky method of shifting responsibility that I think will impress you if not make you shake your head as though Someone has just smashed you over it with a frypan.
Inks made in USA
My life is crazy right now with sports, teaching, and family. I promise to post more often... lots going on and fun things on the horizon! I've been busy!
This is such a great idea! I am loving anchor charts, especially with all of the cute ideas on pinterest. My room is getting way too crowded with my charts and I am also running out of line space. I like the idea of taking a picture of your chart, then putting those pictures into a binder. Children can refer to this binder when in need of that specific strategy they are searching for!
For the first time ever, AJ Styles will take on Tommy Dreamer.
She has come with her glory and the might, in the queen Alblackica night
November 3rd – began the Body By Vi/90 Day Challenge
On the way back we stumbled upon a field of blueberries. Sure, there were blueberries most of the trip, but not in such high density.
This group has welcomed me when I had absolutely nothing to offer them.
So I was walking through Walgreens today and getting bummed out because the truck comes in on Thursday but they really didn't have too many items back in stock yet. Then I glanced down on a shelf and saw the blue mosquito repellant clip on things...I don't use them because I don't go outside but my dad uses them when he mows and stuff. Anyway, they have new smaller ones, but the blue ones were on clearance.
I'm torn as to whether "Sirens of Titan" remains as a classic or not. It's true that Vonnegut offers food for thought. But while the examination of humanity's purpose and the issue of free will still resonate within us, I think Christianity and religion as a whole now play a diminished role in our current society on a global scale than they did, say, fifty years ago. Since then agnosticism and atheism have grown popular and at the same time people have grown less religious. The same can be said about deconstructing the family unit. Right now, the dysfunctional family has become the new normal.
Following its merger with Amoco (Standard Oil of Indiana) BP has as many (give or take one percentage point) American as British shareholders. The American designed Deepwater Horizon rig is owned by Transocean, essentially an American company (it originated in Birmingham Alabama, but relocated to Switzerland two years ago for tax reasons). It was operating in American waters, extracting American oil, under American licence and American supervision and regulations. According to the Wall Street Journal, one possible key suspect in the loss of the rig is flaws in the cementing process which plugged holes in the pipeline seal. That work was the responsibility of Halliburton - the world's second largest oilfield services corporation, with its headquarters in Houston, Texas.
Feivel's Flying Horses by Heidi Smith Hyde with illustrations by Johanna van der Sterre
If a child is never spoken to she will never learn to use words. If a child is only criticized he will never learn to speak positively. Children learn by hearing, or by watching in the case of sign language, and then by being given opportunities and encouragement to practise their new skills.
:-( My dog ran away, my wife is having an affair and my dad has cancer.
As I sit here on the precipice of a new decade, I can't help but reflect on the past 10 years. Ten years ago, I was celebrating my second New Year's eve as a married woman; the still newly dubbed Mrs. Beck. We were living in North Carolina for the first time ever. I was hundreds of miles from everything and every one I had ever known. My life was changing in leaps and bounds. I was in my mid twenties, starting a new graduate program at a new university, in a new state. It may as well have been a new part of the world. I was working in a new field, doing a job that I had never planned on doing. It was liberating and it was frightening. I was learning new things about myself daily.Up to that point in my life, I hadn't really been living so much as traveling from point A to point B. Suddenly, I was left alone with just the Big Guy and my thoughts in my world. That was the year that I really began to define myself and learn to be not who everyone thought I should be but to become who I really was on the inside, free of any paradigm. It was exhilarating to discover the me buried under the sister, the daughter, the friend. The world was my oyster.Possibilities were endless and all I needed to do was figure out what I wanted to do with all this new found liberation from expectation.
The result of all this is that cakes aside (the day job) I haven’t shared any dessert recipes. Generally I serve up some variation of a cake if such a course is required, or Oranges steeped in Brandy Syrup. I can be moved to make fruity desserts but the crumbles, pies, cheesecakes, steam sponges, upside-down puddings, tarts, profiteroles and all the rest of it rarely feature in my kitchen. Balance is required. I do have a couple of cheesecake recipes up my sleeves, this one, the easiest, and something which appears to be the best dessert in the world. I struggle to see what all the fuss is about but others have arrived at this consensus. Today we will go with the easiest and work up the best ever.
#1 Doubles: Adam White and Shane Spencer defeated Nick Rashedi and Tyler Badt (6-1) (7-5)
I am not sure if we already had weapons or not or if we ran back to the elevator to go back up to the first level to look for weapons, either way, we came back with weapons and I had a scoped laser rifle with the beam splitter upgrade from the game Fallout New Vegas; and we went back to fight the zombie-like beings, and I remember shooting the first zombie-like being that I saw several times.
Picture these written on a board:
2.) What do you like most about my project? (I know this sounds like fishing for flattery, but it's important to get this perspective)
So my schedule for the last six weeks has been:
4.Share 7 random facts about yourself.
**Yes, it is.
These personal changes are not without a choice. Each of us have a choice and each of us is the master of our destinies. We can choose to move ahead or stay back. This is a year of clear cut decisions and the Universe has decided not to interfere against our wills. The responsibility is upon us. We manifest our fortunes! If last year we knew we couldn’t reach some of our goals because we were not meant to; this year any obstacles to our goals could simply mean we manifested them or must try another approach to our goals.
We need to stop worshipping the culture of plastic beauty and celebrate the life lived.
Marvin is a paraplegic. He lost the use of his legs in a motorcycle accident just a few blocks from his home. He has been volunteering as a diver at the Aquarium, where he helps to clean the tanks twice a month. He cannot do this alone. He is required to have two other divers in the tank with him while he is there. In this photo you can see the lift that was put in place to help him get his gear into the tank. You can see him operating it here.
What's awesome is that so many things are aligning with the project. This blog and Facebook have already structured a platform for what I'm doing. I've been getting feedback from friends and readers, who are informing my content. Bits of life are coming together to support my theme, and I almost have my proposal ready.
David was real. He was not a figment of her imagination. And she was real....not a figment of his imagination.
Numerous experts are quoted as suspecting "serious under reporting"; "perhaps these figures are concealed for political reasons"; "the reason for this under reporting could be the desire to change the ongoing reputation of South Africa as the crime capital of the world." Yours in conscience.
Quote reads front:
No, I am Korean.
Brian Foster is taking off his gear as he is walking to the cage. I’m not sure that I’ve ever seen anyone more anxious to fight.
'Yes Sir'
It has been decided for the first fanclub event since Bigeast was restarted to be held!
Feel free to contact me with any questions ecarlateboutique@yahoo.com and/or visit our website http://www.ecarlateboutique.etsy.com to take a look at our product line. For the Palm Springs locals and visitors, we participate at the Village Fest each and every Thursday. It is located on Palm Canyon from 6:00 PM till 10:00 PM. Our booth is located in front of Frenchies and across the street from California Pizza Kitchen.
This episode will take on two films known for their controversial material. Released in 1980, Cannibal Holocaust quickly became one of the most widely censored films of all time. Its highly realistic scenes of human murder as well as actual footage of animal cruelty were cause for protest and even legal prosecution. In years since, the film has gained renewed relevance as a commentary on documentary films and the exploitation of developing cultures by industrialized cultures. In 2000, director Mary Harron adapted Bret Easton Ellis' novel American Psycho, probably the most controversial piece of literature in the last quarter of the 20th century, into a commentary on the culture of greed of the 1980s. On the tenth anniversary of the film's release, that commentary has found renewed relevance.
6. See “The Descendants” before Oscar time to understand what all the fuss is rightly about!
What are your block breakers?
The Supreme Court overturned the law. It viewed the case as an issue between states’ rights and federal government rights, over who can set foreign policy. It ignored the issue of individual rights, the Constitution’s Bill of Rights, including the right to speak out against unethical government purchasing, and also to have one’s elected representatives do so as well.
Cant describe the feeling in Words
Donna Salazar stamp-Stanza
In the Bowery space, Sherry has applied this audacious color to tightly cropped, skyless images of American desert dirt and rock formations, turning jumbles of stones, gully washes and smooth erosions into otherworldly landscapes in crimson and acidic lime green. Craggy patterns of swirls and lines, pits and deformations become almost abstract when swimming in such unexpected incandescent color. Each one is like a scene from some dusty uninhabited planet, lit by some strange combination of nearby stars.
Former superstar basketball center and current TNT mumbling head Shaquille O’Neal has told Jon Stewart, the New York Times, and ESPN that he’s getting his doctorate at Miami’s Barry University, where he defended his dissertation this month. His purported title? “How Leaders Utilize Humor or Aggression in Leadership Styles.”
Why can't I give like she gives?
So how does one gain a following to make interviews handy and keep the story tips rolling in?
It was, instead, my Crosstown Soft and Wide baby gate by Evenflo from KidsafeInc.com!
Of course, that's because February 14th is Valentine's Day. Whether you celebrate Valentine's Day or not, it's hard to miss the mushy, gushy love vibe.
we breath in defiance
I’m saying put it on silent but still take it with you. When a phone rings, you have the choice to answer it, it doesn’t answer itself. If you don’t want to talk…. Don’t!
@NewburyAstro
The language is a problem most of the times, but with a little patience and a little luck, you can manage to find your way around. If you ask a local what time it is or how far a place is, your question is highly likely to be reciprocated by a giant smile and the words “Yes yes yes”. How do I get there? “Yes yes yes.” At which point you try your luck with the next person, with a giant smile.
And just like this story, God pursues US because He knows just how poisonous sin is and He wants to SAVE US…because He loves us! Bill Bright, founder of Campus Crusade for Christ Int'l shares that in his experience in counseling, he's convinced that tens of thousands of good, faithful church-goers who have received Christ in prayer are not sure of their salvation! Do you have that security in knowing that if you were to die today that you'll go to Heaven? The Bible doesn't use vague words regarding our salvation, like might or hope-to-be, or maybe; it uses words such as will and shall and is!! God's Word is very clear about salvation, so you just need to read it, believe it, claim it and proclaim it! Here are just a handful of Promises that God has given to us...
Although, if I dont get it I’ll be miserable for weeks on end.
Ok, we see nothing on this picture except the website name, and the name of the artist !
September 22, 2011
Names..Address..Tel..Country..Occupation..
Knob Creek, Canton Ginger Liquor,
The IrsiCaixa lab bank account for the XMRV study in ME/CFS is:
Action steps:
The Azeri National Security Ministry reported earlier that Padarov was killed in a special operation in Ganca last week.
Love and Honour ( A Prayer).
Must have a proven record of activity & genuine love for SL. Your avatar must be at least 1 SLyear old with payment info on file & a complete, informative profile.
Have you guessed? Its Ibiza, although (I'm bored of justifying it, but I feel I ought to!) it won't be the clubby part- we got a lovely deal on a half-board holiday at the opposite end of the island, where all of the slower-paced-people go! It will be wandery, and relaxing. The scenery looks fantastic. Its my first sunny holiday in 14 years, and I have (modest amounts of) shopping to do for it. You'll be hearing more of this, I'm sure.
If you remember nothing else, remember that any reference by anyone to “greenhouse gas emissions” involves the lie that they influence the weather or the world’s climate.
When I first got my condo and lived with my roommate our place was clean almost all the time! No pets and no kids certainly helped that. Somehow we managed to do the dishes and keep the trash picked up and for the most part everything had a place and stayed in that place…. Over the next 5 years or so things changed, a lot … My roomate moved out, I got a cat, then another, then I got married, then we got a dog, then we got a new roommate, then we got another dog then our condo had too much stuff and we had to move. :/ We moved and had several roommates in and out throughout the years, managed to get THREE more dogs and have a baby!
Take it away, Courtney!
* bonus tracks for CD issue.
The Collaborator, Mirza Waheed (Viking)
Here at DITHOB we've pondered the future of books -- we know folks will always read, it is simply a question of format. For example, we asked what will be the future of the book reading/book signing ? Will the physical tome remain as a collectible artifact, sort of like making an appearance on the NY Times website or blog, and also making it into the NY Times daily paper (since the two are not congruent)? Will their be some evolution of the author's electronic signature that will pulse, neon-like, in the corner of your e-reader? More here
The instinct to explore, to wonder, is a natural part of the human condition. Consider how many thousands of years men and women gazed at the night sky and wondered what’s up there. From the earliest humans to today, it’s likely that everyone ever born has wanted to know more about the mysteries of space.
The man was arrested and has been interviewed by police.
I chose Straight Talk and got rid of my previous contract. I am spending more than fifty percent less on my phone calls. I am going to use those saving to spoil my family members during the Christmas season.
“No, it wouldn’t. People would probably go crazy with power and greed, think they were invincible and try to take over the world. There would be a lot of fights.”
These lessons ended quite abruptly after she decided to stroke my hands and rub my shoulders consistently. I was 14 and not into GILF’s.
I don't know how I could have felt musically fulfilled before we were "us."
The moment you say ‘No way. Never.’
And to the Inchcape Rock they go;
-I would have got to say to you in a final and formal way "Thank you for all you have done for me. Thank you for protecting me and taking care of me. Thank you for making me feel loved in the formative years when my life as a child was so unsteady. Thank you for being who you were which was cool and wild and adventurous at heart. Thank you for tickling my back those hot summer nights as a little girl. Thank you for taking me EVERYWHERE with you, including auto shops, motorcycle shops, back woods cafes and letting me stop at every gumball and candy machine on the way out. Thank you for the moments of falling asleep with my head in your lap on long drives and sitting on your lap while watching TV clear up until I was in 7th grade. Thank you for loving the girls the way you did. They have so many fond memories. You made the ordinary, extraordinary. Thank you for letting me know you had my back if I EVER needed you. Thank you for being the one true constant in my life since the day I was born. Thank you for taking care of me when you could have been off having fun, living your life. Thank for taking me in for good when I was in 6th grade. Thank you for allowing me to run into bed with you and grams in the middle of the night because I was scared, and it was often. Thank you for coming to my house at 3 in the morn if I got scared to look for the boogieman. Thank you for just ALWAYS being there when I needed you. That is so rare these days."
